   Company Profile | Charter Communications Newsroom            Company ProfileLearn about Charter and its business units. About Charter Company History Quality Products and Services Connecting with Communities 26,000,000Charter customers 41States Charter serves 91,000Charter employeesAbout CharterCharter Communications (NASDAQ: CHTR) is America’s fastest growing TV, internet and voice company. We’re committed to integrating the highest quality service with superior entertainment and communications products. Charter is at the intersection of technology and entertainment, facilitating essential communications that connect more than 26 million residential and business customers in 41 states. Our commitment to serving customers and exceeding their expectations is the bedrock of Charter’s business strategy and it’s the philosophy that guides our 91,000 employees.Company HistoryCharter is currently the second largest cable provider in the United States. The company has achieved growth through innovation and acquisitions of cable properties, most recently completing transactions with Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks.The Charter name comes from the founding of Charter Communications, Inc. in 1993 and, while the company has grown and evolved on many levels over the past two decades, our roots take us all the way back to the early days of cable. What started as mom-and-pop businesses with cable strung from hilltops to homes in the late 1940s has evolved into the dynamic cable industry we know today. 1948First cable systems are founded  1951The National Cable & Telecommunications Association (NCTA), the principal trade association for the U.S. cable industry, is founded  1964Newhouse begins operating cable systems with the purchase of its first system in Alabama, branding it NewChannels  1973Warner Communications forms Warner Cable  1979Newhouse forms second cable company, MetroVision, in partnership with former Cox executives  1981Newhouse adds Vision Cable to cable assets  1989Time Warner Inc. forms through merger of Warner Communications and Time Inc.  1992Warner Cable and American Television & Communications (ATC) combine to form Time Warner Cable  1993Charter Communications, Inc. is founded and acquisitions of cable systems across the country begin  1994Time Warner Entertainment and Advance/Newhouse form cable partnership  1998Microsoft co-founder Paul Allen buys a controlling interest in Charter  1999Charter begins trading publicly on the NASDAQ stock exchange under symbol CHTR  2001Charter earns spot on Fortune 500  2003Advance/Newhouse begins operating Bright House Networks with approximately 2.2 million customers in Alabama, California, Florida, Indiana and Michigan  2007Time Warner Cable begins trading publicly on the NYSE  2009Charter completes financial restructuring under chapter 11, emerging as a stronger company under new equity ownershipTime Warner Cable separates from Time Warner Inc.  2012Thomas M. Rutledge is appointed President & CEO of Charter  2013Charter gains Liberty Media as an investor and announces Spectrum brand  2016Charter, Time Warner Cable and Bright House Networks combine to form larger, stronger Charter Quality Products and ServicesSuperior, reliable, consistent services that deliver value – that’s our focus. Over the years, Charter has invested billions of dollars in infrastructure improvements, unleashing the power of an advanced, two-way, fully interactive fiber network. By moving to this all-digital network, today’s Charter customers enjoy the most HD TV channels, more On Demand choices and the fastest internet speeds.Charter delivers a wide range of TV, internet and voice services to residential and business customers through the Spectrum brand.Spectrum TV offers more HD than any other provider, DVR service and instant access to thousands of On Demand choices, many in HD. Watch live TV anywhere in the home or download movies and shows to go on mobile devices with the Spectrum TV App or take TV Everywhere with over 60 channel apps to watch on the go.Spectrum Internet provides the fastest Internet speeds available starting at 60 Mbps (100 Mbps in some markets). With Spectrum Internet, customers can simultaneously stream videos, download music and more without sacrificing performance. Charter provides free modems and the fastest, most powerful in-home WiFi to do more on more devices. And because Charter doesn’t limit internet with data caps or extra fees, customers always have the freedom of unlimited internet service.Spectrum Voice is a fully featured, reliable service with unlimited local and long-distance calling plans that include voicemail and other popular calling features like call waiting and call forwarding, plus free 411. Serving approximately 10 million voice customers, Charter is among the largest providers of residential phone service in the nation.Spectrum Business helps small businesses achieve better results by delivering reliable Internet, Ethernet, voice and enhancement solutions. Spectrum Business customers enjoy a wide range of products – from high-quality broadband services to phone systems and top-tier digital TV and music – all flexible to meet the demands of growing businesses.Spectrum Enterprise builds business-to-business solutions with a people-to-people focus, providing the bandwidth and support customers need to accelerate business. Charter’s largest customers enjoy enterprise-grade voice, video, data, network, cloud and managed services via a flexible and secure fiber-based network.Spectrum Community Solutions provide customized, managed WiFi, TV and voice services to residential apartments and other multi-dwelling units via fiber connections. Spectrum Fiber WiFi delivers the fastest, most powerful connection with more bandwidth and no data caps.Spectrum Reach, the advertising sales division of Charter, offers traditional commercial advertising and new interactive solutions for the modern media landscape. Spectrum Reach offers promotional solutions through national cable networks, internet advertising, mobile marketing and events supported by marketing, research and creative services teams.Connecting with CommunitiesCharter is committed to improving communities and impacting lives where our customers and employees live, work and play.Through our national philanthropic initiative, Spectrum Housing Assist, Charter partners with nonprofit organizations to make homes safer and healthier. We engage employees and community volunteers in order to facilitate these crucial home repairs, with the goal of improving 25,000 homes by the year 2020.To learn more about Spectrum Housing Assist and our other philanthropic efforts, please visit responsibility.spectrum.com. © 2017 Charter CommunicationsTerms of ServicePrivacyPolicyInvestor RelationsContacts 

Bizapedia.com - Human Validation
















COMPANIESPEOPLEPRODUCTS/SERVICESTRADEMARKSADDRESSESPHONE BOOK




            Our system has detected a high number of page requests from your IP Address, please prove to us that you are a human to continue using our website.
        
























                            Please send me to the search subscription offer page after I successfully answer the word challenge.
                        









BIZAPEDIAPRO SEARCHPerform unlimited searches via ouradvanced search form withBizapedia Pro Search.FIND OUT MORE >BIZAPEDIAPRO DATABuild custom data listsfor one or many stateswith Bizapedia Pro Data.FIND OUT MORE >


Copyright © 2012-2017 · Bizapedia.com · All rights reserved.BlogPro SearchPro APIContact UsTerms of UsePrivacy PolicySitemapDesktop Version















Time Warner Cable - Wikipedia






















 






Time Warner Cable

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Time Warner Cable Inc.


Time Warner Cable's final logo used until the acquisition with Charter Communications.




Former type

Subsidiary


Industry
Telecommunications
Mass media


Fate
Acquired by Charter Communications


Successor
Spectrum


Founded
1973; 44 years ago (1973)


Founder
Time Warner
(merger of Time Inc. & Warner Communications)


Defunct
2016; 1 year ago (2016)


Headquarters
Time Warner Center, New York City, New York, United States



Area served

United States



Key people

Robert D. Marcus
(Chairman & CEO)


Parent
Warner Communications (1973–1990)
Time Warner (1990-2009) Charter Communications (2016-Present)


Subsidiaries
Time Warner Cable Enterprises LLC






Time Warner Center, formerly the headquarters of the company in New York City. It was shared by its namesake, but now unrelated company, Time Warner.






Time Warner Cable building entrance in Morrisville, North Carolina


Time Warner Cable (TWC) was an American cable television company. Prior to its purchase by Charter Communications in 2016, it was ranked the second largest cable company in the United States by revenue behind only Comcast, operating in 29 states.[1] Its corporate headquarters were located in the Time Warner Center in Midtown Manhattan, New York City,[2] with other corporate offices in Stamford, Connecticut; Charlotte, North Carolina; and Herndon, Virginia.[3]
It was controlled by Warner Communications, then by Time Warner (the film and television production company and cable channel operator). That company spun off the cable operations in March 2009 as part of a larger restructuring. From 2009 to 2016, Time Warner Cable was an entirely independent company, continuing to use the Time Warner name under license from its former parent (including the "Road Runner" name for its Internet service, now Spectrum Internet).
In 2014, the company was the subject of a proposed purchase by Comcast Corporation, valued at $45.2 billion; however, following opposition to the deal by various groups, along with plans by the U.S. government to try to block the merger, Comcast called off the deal in April 2015. On May 26, 2015, Charter Communications announced that it would acquire Time Warner Cable for $78.7 billion, along with Bright House Networks in a separate $10.1 billion deal, pending regulatory approval.[4]
The purchase was completed on May 18, 2016; Charter had continued to do business as Time Warner Cable in its former markets, but has now re-branded these operations under the Spectrum brand in most markets.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sale


2 Residential services
3 Business services
4 Cable Internet service
5 Naming rights

5.1 Current

5.1.1 Arena


5.2 Former

5.2.1 Fox Cities Stadium




6 Acquisitions

6.1 Adelphia
6.2 NaviSite
6.3 Insight Communications
6.4 DukeNet Communications


7 Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)
8 Venture with Sprint Nextel
9 Controversies

9.1 Bandwidth metering
9.2 Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography


10 Cable clusters
11 Divisions

11.1 West Region
11.2 East Region
11.3 Former divisions


12 Rankings
13 See also
14 References



History[edit]
Time Warner Cable was formed in 1992 by the merger of Time Inc.'s cable television company, American Television and Communications Corp. (service areas that had belonged to that company went under the Time Warner Communications name; since the 1990s, areas that had used that name have either been renamed to Time Warner Cable, Bright House Networks, or have been given to other cable providers), and Warner Cable, a division of Warner Communications, as a result of a merger to form Time Warner; for the two years after the merger, the companies operated separately but under the umbrella name "Time Warner Cable Group" (primarily due to 18% of ATC having been publicly owned at the time); they merged into one entity in 1992. It also includes the remnants of the defunct QUBE interactive TV service. In 1995, the company launched the Southern Tier On-Line Community, a cable modem service later known as Road Runner High Speed Online. That year, talks began that would later result in Warner's acquisition of Paragon Cable. Glenn Britt (1949–2014)[6][7] was the CEO from 2001 until December 2013.
Time Warner retained Time Warner Cable as a subsidiary until March 2009, when it was spun out as an independent company.[8] Prior to the spin-out, Time Warner had held an 84% stake in Time Warner Cable.[9] Non-Time Warner shareholders received 0.083670 shares for each share already owned. This move made Time Warner Cable the largest cable operator in the United States owned solely by a single class of shareholders (without supervoting stock).[10]
Time Warner Cable launched DVR service in the Houston area in 2004. (TWC's Houston-area cable systems are now owned by Comcast.) When first launched, it used Scientific-Atlanta set-top boxes with DVR.
In June 2009, Time Warner Cable unveiled a concept known as "TV Everywhere"—a means of allowing multi-platform access to live and on-demand content to content from television channels that is tied to a user's television subscription.[11][12]
Sale[edit]
Main article: Attempted purchase of Time Warner Cable by Comcast
It was first reported in October 2013 that Time Warner Cable was exploring a sale of the company, possibly to Charter Communications.[13] However, on November 22, 2013, reports surfaced that Comcast expressed interest in acquiring Time Warner Cable. Both companies were said to be placing bids for the company.[14] Charter reiterated its interest in purchasing Time Warner Cable and increased its bid on January 14, 2014. On February 12, 2014, it was reported that Comcast had reached a deal to acquire TWC in an overall deal valued at $45.2 billion, pending regulatory approval.[15]
The proposed merger was met with prominent opposition from various groups, showing concerns that the sheer size of the combined company would reduce competition and would give Comcast an unprecedented level of control over the United States' internet and television industries, increased leverage in the distribution of NBCUniversal content, hamper over-the-top services, and lead to higher prices for its services.[16][17][18][19] In April 2015, it was reported that the U.S. Department of Justice was preparing to file an antitrust lawsuit against the companies in a bid to halt the merger, primarily because the merged company would have controlled 57 percent of the nation's broadband capacity. On April 24, 2015, Comcast officially announced that it had called off the merger.[20][21]
On May 25, 2015, Bloomberg News reported that Charter was "near" a deal to acquire TWC for $195 a share.[22] Charter had been involved in the Comcast/TWC merger, as the companies planned to divest around 4 million subscribers to Charter in order to reduce the combined company's market share to an acceptable level.[23] The next day, Charter officially announced its intent to acquire Time Warner Cable in a deal valued at $78.7 billion, and confirmed that it would also continue with its proposed, $10.1 billion acquisition of Bright House Networks. The deal was subject to regulatory approval, although due to the relatively smaller size of the companies and their media holdings, the deal was expected to face less resistance than the Comcast/TWC merger.[24]
The acquisition was completed on May 18, 2016. The Time Warner Cable brand was phased out in favor of Spectrum, the brand used by Charter to market its services.[25][5][26]
Residential services[edit]
As of second quarter 2009, there were 14.6 million basic cable subscribers, 8.8 million Digital cable subscribers, 8.7 million Road Runner residential subscribers, 2.5 million DVR subscribers,[27] and 4.5 million residential Digital Phone subscribers, which makes it the fifth-largest landline phone provider in the United States.[28]
Business services[edit]
As of 2013, Time Warner Cable's business division had the second largest business-facing enterprise by revenue (of cable providers who offer business services), with $1.7 billion in revenue as of the third quarter of 2013. Total revenue for 2012 was $1.9 billion.[29]
Cable Internet service[edit]
Main article: Spectrum Internet
Naming rights[edit]
Current[edit]
Arena[edit]
Spectrum Center, formerly Time Warner Cable Arena, is located in Charlotte, North Carolina, the home of the NBA's Charlotte Hornets. In April 2008, the then-Bobcats reached a naming rights deal with Time Warner Cable, the Charlotte area's major cable television provider; the arena was named for the cable provider in exchange for the release of the team's television rights, which had been on the TWC co-owned Carolinas Sports Entertainment Television for its first season, which failed to find much cable coverage in the Charlotte market outside of Time Warner systems and went dark after a year, and then News 14 Carolina which was limited to only the North Carolina side of the market, until the arena naming rights deal was made. The team moved to the new Fox Sports South sub-feed Fox Sports Carolinas and SportSouth (now Fox Sports Southeast) with the 2008-09 season, allowing coverage through both the Carolinas.[30] Shortly after being acquired by Charter, the arena was renamed to Spectrum Center.
Former[edit]
Fox Cities Stadium[edit]
Main article: Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium
On March 9, 2007, Time Warner Cable, which provides service to the northeastern Wisconsin area, signed a 10-year naming rights deal. The field is home of the Wisconsin Timber Rattlers, a local minor league baseball team of the Midwest League and affiliate of the Milwaukee Brewers, based in Grand Chute, a suburb of Appleton. The team and Time Warner Cable mutually agreed to end the rights deal after the 2013 season, and the venue is now known as Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium, named for a local neurology practice.
Acquisitions[edit]
Adelphia[edit]
On July 31, 2007, Time Warner Cable and Comcast completed a deal to purchase practically all of Adelphia's assets for $17 billion.[31] Time Warner Cable gained 3.3 million of Adelphia's subscribers, a 29 percent increase, while Comcast gained almost 1.7 million subscribers. Adelphia stockholders received 16% of Time Warner Cable. Time Warner Cable went public effective February 13, 2007, and the company began trading on the New York Stock Exchange on March 1, 2007.[32]
In addition to Adelphia's coverage being divided up, Time Warner Cable and Comcast also agreed to exchange some of their own subscribers in order to consolidate key regions. An example of this is the Los Angeles market, which was mostly covered by Comcast and Adelphia (and some areas of the region already served by TWC), is now under Time Warner Cable. Philadelphia had been split between Time Warner and Comcast, with the majority of cable subscribers belonging to Comcast. Time Warner subscribers in Philadelphia were swapped with Comcast in early 2007. Similarly, the Houston area, which was under Time Warner, was swapped to Comcast, while the Dallas metro area was changed to Time Warner (RR).[33] In the Twin Cities, Minneapolis was Time Warner and Saint Paul was Comcast. That whole market is now Comcast.
NaviSite[edit]
Time Warner Cable purchased NaviSite (NAVI), a company providing cloud and hosting services, on February 1, 2011 for $230 million, roughly equating to $5.50 per share.[34]
Insight Communications[edit]
On August 13, 2011, Time Warner Cable announced its purchase of Insight Communications for $3 billion acquiring Insight's 760,000 subscribers nationwide. The merger was completed February 29, 2012, and as of June 2013 all of Insight Communications was absorbed into Time Warner Cable.[35]
DukeNet Communications[edit]
On October 7, 2013, Time Warner Cable announced that it has agreed to acquire DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million. DukeNet provides data and high-capacity bandwidth services to wireless carrier, data center, government, and enterprise customers in the Southeast.[36]
Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)[edit]
Some of the regional cable system clusters operated by Time Warner Cable are owned by the Time Warner Entertainment – Advance/Newhouse Partnership (TWEAN). In 2002, Advance/Newhouse Communications, unhappy with some of the operating policies of Time Warner Cable in the AOL Time Warner era, forced a restructuring of the TWEAN partnership such that Advance/Newhouse would actively manage and operate a portion of the jointly owned cable systems equal to their percentage of equity. Under this arrangement, Advance/Newhouse enjoys the proceeds of their actively managed systems rather than simply a percentage of the partnership's total earnings. The majority of the affected systems are in the Tampa and Orlando markets under the Bright House Networks brand.
The value of this deal is that it allows Advance/Newhouse to more directly control their cable investments without having to completely unravel the TWEAN partnership, which does bring some benefits via Time Warner's development and purchasing clout.
The transactions proposed by Charter were approved, TWC and Bright House Networks have been absorbed into Charter.[24]
Venture with Sprint Nextel[edit]
In late 2005, TWC and several other cable companies formed a venture with Sprint Nextel. This joint venture enables TWC customers to receive a full suite of products, linking in-home and out-of-home entertainment, information, and communications services. All of this was included in the new "Triple Play on the Go", similar to the Triple Play[discuss] but an addition of new services through Sprint Nextel.
Controversies[edit]
Bandwidth metering[edit]
In Beaumont, Texas, during 2008, Time Warner Cable began testing tier-based metered data plans that effectively placed customers into a pricing hierarchy based on the amount of data that they used, [clarification needed].[37] In 2009, Time Warner Cable announced that additional cities including Rochester, New York will become additional test sites. In particular in Rochester groups have formed to stop TWC. Several groups including Stop TWC[38] and Stop The Cap[39] are currently working to oppose these efforts. On April 7, 2009, then US Congressman Eric Massa called on Time Warner to eliminate its broadband Internet cap.[40]
Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography[edit]
On March 16, 2010, Time Warner Cable's transmission of their Kids on Demand and Kids Pre-School on Demand channels on systems in eastern North Carolina was interrupted by programming from the adult pay television channel Playboy TV for approximately two hours between 6:15 a.m. and 8:15 a.m./EDT, in which a group of nude women talked and posed in a sexually suggestive manner.[41] This accidental display affected Time Warner's digital cable subscribers in four towns in the system's eastern North Carolina cluster, while other areas displayed a black screen. A Time Warner spokesperson said in a statement to Raleigh CBS affiliate WRAL, "It was a technical malfunction that caused the wrong previews to be shown on our kids' on-demand channels. Unfortunately it hit at the worst possible time on the worst possible channels."[42] A Time Warner executive said normal monitoring procedures did not take effect because the glitch affected only a few areas. Customers were told to pay the small fee, and that their next bill would be reduced. [43]
Cable clusters[edit]




Time Warner Cable ident used until 2010. Remained in use on its "Business Class" division.



West Coast cluster

California – Barstow, Desert Cities, Orange County, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego
Hawaii (operating as Oceanic Time Warner Cable)


Midwest cluster

Kansas – Kansas City, Overland Park, Olathe, Shawnee
Missouri – Kansas City, Independence, Lee's Summit
Nebraska
Ohio – Akron, Bowling Green/North Baltimore, Canton, Cincinnati, Cleveland, Columbus, Dayton, Findlay/Lima, and Youngstown
Kentucky – Lexington, Louisville, Northern Kentucky, Ashland
Pennsylvania – Erie County, Sharon, Franklin
Wisconsin – Green Bay and Milwaukee


Northeast cluster

Maine
New Hampshire – Berlin, Keene
Massachusetts – Athol, Pittsfield
Upstate New York


The Carolinas cluster

North Carolina – Charlotte, Raleigh, Greensboro, and Wilmington
South Carolina – Columbia, Sumter, Florence, Summerville, Hilton Head and Myrtle Beach.


New York cluster

New Jersey – Bergen County, Hudson County
New York – New York City (Manhattan, Queens, Staten Island, most of western Brooklyn); Mount Vernon (Westchester County, rest of county is Cablevision)


Texas cluster

Texas – Arlington, Austin, Beaumont/Port Arthur, Corpus Christi, Dallas, El Paso, Harlingen, Killeen/Temple, Laredo, Rio Grande Valley, San Antonio, Waco, and Wichita Falls

coincidentally, the Irving-Grapevine-Coppell-Lewisville cluster had been under Time Warner Cable's control upon acquisition of Paragon Cable. This was prior to AT&T Broadband's full absorption of that cluster.




Not in a cluster (National)

Alabama – Dothan, Enterprise
Arizona – Yuma
California – El Centro
Colorado – Gunnison, Telluride
Idaho – Coeur d'Alene, Moscow
Indiana – Terre Haute
Virginia
Washington – Pullman
West Virginia – Clarksburg



Divisions[edit]
Time Warner Cable's divisions, from official website:
West Region[edit]




Former logo for "Oceanic Time Warner Cable" division



PAC West Region

Oceanic Time Warner Cable (Hawaii)
Time Warner Cable Desert Cities
Time Warner Cable San Diego
Time Warner Cable Southern California (SoCal)


Midwest Region

Time Warner Cable Kansas City
Time Warner Cable Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Northeast Ohio & Western Pennsylvania (Akron, Canton, Cleveland & Youngstown; Erie County & Sharon, PA)
Time Warner Cable Mid-Ohio (Columbus)
Time Warner Cable Southwest Ohio (Dayton; Cincinnati; Lexington, KY; Louisville, KY; Terre Haute, IN; Clarksburg, WV)
Time Warner Cable Wisconsin (Milwaukee & Green Bay)


Texas Region
Time Warner Cable National (non-clustered systems)

East Region[edit]




Time Warner Cable Spectrum.



Northeast Region

Time Warner Cable Albany
Time Warner Cable Buffalo
Time Warner Cable Rochester
Time Warner Cable Central New York / Syracuse
Time Warner Cable New England
Time Warner Cable New York City


Carolinas Region

Time Warner Cable Charlotte
Time Warner Cable Greensboro
Time Warner Cable Eastern Carolina
Time Warner Cable Raleigh
Time Warner Cable South Carolina (Columbia)
Time Warner Cable Fayetteville/Sandhills



Former divisions[edit]
Sold to Comcast

Time Warner Cable Houma
Time Warner Cable Houston
Time Warner Cable Lake City/Live Oak
Time Warner Cable Mid-South (Memphis, TN, AR, and MS)
Time Warner Cable Minnesota
Time Warner Cable Shreveport
Time Warner Cable St. Augustine/Palatka
Time Warner Cable Cape Coral/Naples

Divisions that became Bright House Networks

Time Warner Cable Central Florida[44]
Time Warner Cable Tampa Bay

Rankings[edit]
The American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI) ranked Time Warner Cable as one of the least liked companies in terms of customer satisfaction in 2011,[45] 2012,[46] 2013,[7][47] and 2014.[48]
See also[edit]

List of United States telephone companies
Spectrum Sports

References[edit]


^ "Top 25 Multichannel Video Service Customers (2012)". National Cable & Telecommunications Association. Retrieved 2013-01-02. 
^ "Investor Relations Contact Us." Time Warner Cable. Retrieved on March 6, 2010.
^ "Locations". Time Warner Cable. Archived from the original on July 16, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2012. 
^ Smith, Gerry (June 25, 2015). "Charter Promises Faster, Cheaper Internet to Win Merger Approval". Bloomberg. 
^ a b "So Long Time Warner Cable: Charter to Retire Much-Maligned Brand". Bloomberg. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Glenn Britt timeline" (PDF). 
^ a b Henry, David; Sherman, Alex (June 11, 2014). "Glenn Britt, Who Raised Time Warner Cable Shares, Dies at 65". Bloomberg. Retrieved September 6, 2014. 
^ "Time Warner Cable Spinoff to Finish Next Month". New York Times. February 27, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner's $9 Billion Cable Spinoff". CBS News. Associated Press. May 21, 2008. Retrieved May 23, 2008. 
^ "Time Warner Sets Final Distribution Ratio For Cable Spinoff". Dow Jones (via CNN Money). March 20, 2009. Retrieved March 27, 2009. [dead link]
^ Lasar, Matthew (June 24, 2009). "Is Comcast and TimeWarner's "TV Everywhere" TV for everyone?". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ Cheng, Jacqui (December 15, 2009). "Comcast expands online video to all cable+Internet customers". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ "Analyst: Charter, Time Warner Cable Merger Looks Probable". Fox Business.com. September 11, 2013. Retrieved September 11, 2013. 
^ Flint, Joe; James, Meg (November 22, 2013). "Charter Communications and Comcast may battle for Time Warner Cable". New York Times. Retrieved November 22, 2013. 
^ Baker, Liana B. (February 13, 2014). "CORRECTED-UPDATE 7-Comcast takeover of Time Warner Cable to reshape U.S. pay TV". Reuters. Retrieved 13 February 2014. 
^ "Netflix Says It Opposes Comcast’s Merger Bid". The New York Times. 21 Apr 2014. Retrieved 25 Apr 2014. 
^ "More Than 50 Public Interest Groups Speak Out Against the Comcast-Time Warner Cable Merger". Freepress.net. 8 Apr 2014. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Julian Hattem (24 Mar 2014). "Writers Guild protests Comcast-Time Warner deal". The Hill. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Ira Teinowitz (9 Apr 2014). "Consumer Group Slams Comcast, Time-Warner Deal at New Senate Hearing (Updated)". The Wrap. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ "Comcast/TWC merger may be blocked by Justice Department". Ars Technica. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Comcast / Time Warner Cable / Charter Transactions Terminated – Comcast Press Statement". Comcast. Retrieved 24 April 2015. 
^ Sherman, Alex (25 May 2015). "Charter Near Deal for Time Warner Cable at $195 a Share". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 25 May 2015. 
^ McGrath, Maggie (28 April 2014). "Comcast Strikes Deal With Charter To Divest Nearly 4 Million Subscribers". Forbes. Retrieved 9 June 2014. 
^ a b Steel, Emily (May 26, 2015). "Charter Communications Agrees to Acquire Time Warner Cable". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Charter completes purchase of Time Warner Cable, Bright House". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Charter introduces Spectrum brand in Southern California". Los Angeles Times. September 20, 2016. Retrieved September 21, 2016. 
^ "About Us - Time Warner Cable's Company History and News". 
^ Leichtman Research Group, "Research Notes," First Quarter 2012, pg. 6, Time Warner (#5) with 4,544,000 residential phone lines.
^ "Heavy Reading: Cable Biz Sales to Hit $8.5B | Light Reading". 
^ "Deals widen Bobcats' TV reach". Charlotte.com. April 9, 2008. Retrieved April 16, 2008. 
^ "CNNMoney.com: Time Warner to save on programming costs after Adelphia Deal – Jul, 31. 2006". CNN. July 31, 2006. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Press Release: Time Warner Cable Becomes a Public Company". Timewarner.com. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ Ehling, Jeff (August 2, 2006). "Time-Warner Cable leaving Houston". KTRK-TV. American Broadcasting Company. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Cable buys NaviSite as hosting acquisitions pick up". zdnet.com. February 1, 2011. Retrieved August 21, 2011. 
^ "Lexington, KY local and state news by the Lexington Herald-Leader – Kentucky.com". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Time Warner Cable to acquire Regional Fiber Optic Network Company DukeNet Communications". Retrieved 8 October 2013. 
^ Lawson, Stephen (January 18, 2008). "Time Warner to Try Tiered Cable Pricing". IDG News Service. PC World. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ "Stop TWC – More Info Coming Soon! Please Check Back!". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Stop the Cap!". Stop the Cap!. Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ Massa, Eric. "Congressman Eric Massa calls on Time Warner to eliminate Broadband Internet Cap". Archived from the original on April 9, 2009. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ Pearson, Erica (March 17, 2010). "Time Warner apologizes for accidentally showing Playboy previews on kiddie channels in N.C". Daily News. New York. 
^ Davis, Stacy (2010-03-16). "Time Warner apologizes for Playboy-kids channel glitch". WRAL.com. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ [1] Archived February 3, 2013, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Time Warner Cable changes name to Bright House". Orlando Business Journal. American City Business Journals. March 7, 2003. 
^ Lubin, Gus; Vivian Giang (2011-06-29). "The 19 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ Spector, Dina; Gus Lubin; Vivian Giang (2012-06-22). "The 15 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ "Benchmarks by Companies: All Companies". American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI). 
^ Fottrell, Quentin (December 31, 2014). "The most unpopular company in America is …". MarketWatch. Retrieved January 25, 2015. 








v
t
e


Charter Communications



Leadership



Thomas M. Rutledge (CEO)





Internet properties



Spectrum Internet





Cable
television
channels




News channels



Austin
Buffalo
Capital Region
Central NY
Florida

Bay News 9
News 13
InfoMás


New York City

NY1
NY1 Noticias
NY1 Rail and Road


North Carolina
Rochester





Sports channels



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet/Deportes LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





Local / Regional



Charter TV3 (Worcester)
Spectrum Community

Maine
Southern California


Spectrum OC16 (Hawaii)













Links to related articles











v
t
e


Liberty Interactive



Liberty Interactive Group



Bodybuilding.com (83%)
BuySeasons
CommerceHub (99%)
Evite
Gifts.com
HSN (34%)
Provide Commerce (ProFlowers)
QVC

Zulily


Right Start





Liberty Ventures Group



Expedia, Inc. (18%)
Interval International (30%)
Tree.com (25%)
TripAdvisor (26%)












v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other specialty television providers in the United States



Cable MVPD



Adams Cable
Allegiance Communications
Altice USA

Optimum
Suddenlink Communications


Armstrong
Atlantic Broadband
Blue Ridge Communications
Blue Stream
Broadstripe
Buckeye Broadband
Cable One
Charter Spectrum
Comcast Xfinity
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


Cox Communications
Docomo Pacific
Emery Telcom
Full Channel
GCI
Hargray
Layer3 TV
Mediacom
Midco
Northland Communications
OneLink Communications
Satview Broadband
Service Electric
SRT Communications
TDS Telecom
TPG

Grande Communications
RCN Corporation
Wave Broadband


TruVista Communications
WOW!





Satellite MVPD



Claro
Dish Network
DirecTV
Glorystar
Headend in the Sky
Home2US





Fiber MVPD / IPTV



AT&T U-verse
CenturyLink Prism TV
Cincinnati Bell FiOptics
Claro
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


EPB
Frontier FiOS
Google Fiber
GTA Teleguam
Hawaiian Telcom
Layer3 TV
Midco
NEP Datastream TV
TDS Telecom
Verizon FiOS
Windstream Kinetic





Virtual MVPD



DirecTV Now
FuboTV
Hulu with Live TV
PlayStation Vue
Skitter TV
Sling TV
YouTube TV





Over-the-top



Amazon Video
Anime Network
Apple TV (iTunes Store)
CBS All Access
Crackle
Crunchyroll
CW Seed
CuriosityStream
DramaFever
Fandor
Feeln
FunimationNow
go90
HBO Now
History Vault
Hulu
iON (IPTV)
Lifetime Movie Club
Netflix
Noggin
Pluto TV
Roku
Seeso
Showtime
StarzPlay
Tribeca Shortlist
Tubi TV
Univision NOW
Yupptv





Defunct cable



Adelphia Communications Corporation
Alameda Power and Telecom1
Astound Broadband
AT&T Broadband

MediaOne / Continental Cablevision
Tele-Communications Inc.


Baja Broadband

US Cable


Bresnan Communications
Bright House Networks
Cablevision
Champion Broadband
Cobridge Communications
Community Home Entertainment
Graceba Total Communications
Insight Communications
Jones Intercable
King Videocable
Knology
Marcus Cable
NPG Cable
Paragon Cable
Rapid Communications
TelePrompTer / Group W Cable
Time Warner Cable
UA-Columbia Cablevision
Windjammer Communications

1 – Still in operation, but no longer offers cable or Internet as part of its services




Defunct satellite



AlphaStar
GlobeCast World TV
PrimeStar
United States Satellite Broadcasting
Voom HD Networks





Defunct IPTV



Sky Angel
Virtual Digital Cable





Defunct terrestrial



Aereo
USDTV
MovieBeam





See also



Radio spectrum pollution












v
t
e


Additional resources on North American television



North America



List of local television stations in North America
DTV transition
North American TV mini-template





Canada



Canadian networks
List of Canadian television networks
List of Canadian television channels
List of Canadian specialty channels
Local Canadian TV stations
List of United States stations available in Canada
2001 Vancouver TV realignment
2007 Canada broadcast TV realignment





Mexico



Mexican networks
Local Mexican TV stations





United States



American networks
List of American cable and satellite networks
List of American over-the-air networks
Local American TV stations (W)
Local American TV stations (K)
Spanish-language TV networks
1994 United States broadcast TV realignment
2006 United States broadcast TV realignment
List of Canadian television stations available in the United States
Insular Areas TV











Africa, Asia, and Oceania
Americas
Europe












v
t
e


Sports television in the United States



Broadcast
divisions





English




American Sports Network
CBS Sports
ESPN on ABC
Fox Sports
NBC Sports
Turner Sports






Spanish




Azteca
Telemundo Deportes (Telemundo/Universo)
Univision Deportes








National
channels





English




beIN Sports
CBS Sports Network
ESPN

ESPN2


FS1

FS2


NBCSN
Olympic Channel






Spanish




beIN Sports en Español
ESPN Deportes
Fox Deportes
Univision Deportes Network








Specialty
channels





College




Big Ten Network
ESPNU
Fox College Sports
Longhorn Network
Pac-12 Network
SEC Network






Single sport




Cricket TicketO
ESPN College Extra
ESPN Goal Line/Buzzer BeaterP
Fox Soccer PlusP
GOL TV
Golf Channel
In DemandP
MAVTV
MLB Network
MLB Extra InningsO
MLB Strike ZoneP
MLS Direct KickO
NBA League PassO
NBA TV
NFL Network
NFL RedZoneP
NFL Sunday TicketO
NHL Network
NHL Center IceO
Tennis Channel
TVG

TVG2


Willow






Outdoors




Frost Great Outdoors
Outdoor Channel
Pursuit Channel
Sportsman Channel
World Fishing Network






Other




Eleven Sports Network
ESPN Classic
ESPNews
ESPN PPVP
Ride TV








Syndicators



ACC Network (Raycom Sports)
ESPN Events





Broadband



Fox Sports Go
MLB.tv
UFC Fight Pass
WatchESPN (ESPN3)
WWE Network
WWNLive





Video on demand



The Ski Channel
Surf Channel













v
t
e


Regional sports television networks in the United States



AT&T SportsNet



Northwest
Pittsburgh
Rocky Mountain
Southwest
Utah





Fox Sports Networks



Arizona
Detroit
Florida / Sun
Midwest

Indiana
Kansas City


North
Ohio / SportsTime Ohio
Southeast / South

Carolinas
Tennessee


Southwest

Oklahoma
New Orleans


West / Prime Ticket

San Diego


Wisconsin
YES Network





NBC Sports Regional Networks
(Comcast)



Bay Area
California
Chicago
Mid-Atlantic
New England
Northwest

Oregon Sports Network


Philadelphia





Spectrum Sports
(Charter)



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





YurView (Cox)



Arizona
California
Kansas
Las Vegas
Louisiana
New England
Oklahoma
Virginia





Independents



Altitude Sports
Buckeye Cable Sports
BYUtv Sports
Cox Sports TV
FiOS1
Longhorn Network
Mid-Atlantic Sports
Midco Sports
MSG Network

Plus
Western NY


NESN
SportsNet NY
SWX Right Now


















v
t
e


Defunct television sports networks in the United States



National



America One
American Sports Classics
Back9Network
Baseball Network
Big 12 Network
CNN SI
ESPN 3D
Football Network
Fox Soccer
Lorimar Sports Network
Mizlou
NASCAR Hot Pass
NewSport
One World Sports
ONTV
SEC TV
Speed
SportsChannel America
Sports Network
Universal Sports Network





Regional



4SD
Carolinas SE
Cox Sports
Empire
Hawkvision
MountainWest
PASS Sports
Prime
PRISM
Royals Sports
SportsChannel LA
Sportsvision
Sports Time
Victory





Out-of-market



ESPN Full Court
ESPN GamePlan
Mega March Madness











O. Out-of-market sports packages P. Premium channel













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Time_Warner_Cable&oldid=792249246"					
Categories: Time Warner CableCable television companies of the United StatesCompanies based in Fairfield County, ConnecticutEntertainment companies established in 1973Media companies established in 1973Media companies disestablished in 2016Media companies of the United States1973 establishments in the United States2016 disestablishments in the United StatesCompanies formerly listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFormer Time Warner subsidiariesVoIP companies of the United States2016 acquisitionsCorporate spin-offsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2010Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from June 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaNederlands日本語Simple EnglishSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 12:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 








Contracting Profile: Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC - Corporate Regulatory - New York NY (DBA Time Warner Cable)

























 



  
    Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC - Corporate Regulatory - New York, NY vendor 833046845            Vendors    Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC - Corpora...          Add Alert          Sign Up     Actions     Add to Partners             Claim Vendor              Similar Vendors              Related Contracts      Related Projects       Help         Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC - Corporate Regulatory - New York NY (DBA Time Warner Cable)   Federal Vendor        Last active 3 weeks ago                     


     0 of 5 with 0 ratings              Need Help?   GovTribe hosts weekly webinars on various topic related to the government contrating industry. Sign up for one today.   Learn more          A GovTribe Overview   Want to better understand the GovTribe website? Take a look at our video tutorials.   Show me!              Name    Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC - Corporate Regulatory - New York NY (DBA Time Warner Cable)        Division    Corporate Regulatory        Parent    Not Listed        Address     60 Columbus Cir New York, NY 10023 USA             Website    Not Listed        Primary Category      Wired Telecommunications Carriers (517110)         Size    Not Listed        Contact(s)      Matthew Foosaner Sales(Government Business) P: 7035612631   Jeannie Horton-Isreal Sales(Government Business - Alternate) P: 9136434922   Marina Cacini Sales(E-Business - Alternate) P: 7037139342          Structure    Other        Designations        Limited Liability Company                                  

















Time Warner Cable - Wikipedia






















 






Time Warner Cable

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Time Warner Cable Inc.


Time Warner Cable's final logo used until the acquisition with Charter Communications.




Former type

Subsidiary


Industry
Telecommunications
Mass media


Fate
Acquired by Charter Communications


Successor
Spectrum


Founded
1973; 44 years ago (1973)


Founder
Time Warner
(merger of Time Inc. & Warner Communications)


Defunct
2016; 1 year ago (2016)


Headquarters
Time Warner Center, New York City, New York, United States



Area served

United States



Key people

Robert D. Marcus
(Chairman & CEO)


Parent
Warner Communications (1973–1990)
Time Warner (1990-2009) Charter Communications (2016-Present)


Subsidiaries
Time Warner Cable Enterprises LLC






Time Warner Center, formerly the headquarters of the company in New York City. It was shared by its namesake, but now unrelated company, Time Warner.






Time Warner Cable building entrance in Morrisville, North Carolina


Time Warner Cable (TWC) was an American cable television company. Prior to its purchase by Charter Communications in 2016, it was ranked the second largest cable company in the United States by revenue behind only Comcast, operating in 29 states.[1] Its corporate headquarters were located in the Time Warner Center in Midtown Manhattan, New York City,[2] with other corporate offices in Stamford, Connecticut; Charlotte, North Carolina; and Herndon, Virginia.[3]
It was controlled by Warner Communications, then by Time Warner (the film and television production company and cable channel operator). That company spun off the cable operations in March 2009 as part of a larger restructuring. From 2009 to 2016, Time Warner Cable was an entirely independent company, continuing to use the Time Warner name under license from its former parent (including the "Road Runner" name for its Internet service, now Spectrum Internet).
In 2014, the company was the subject of a proposed purchase by Comcast Corporation, valued at $45.2 billion; however, following opposition to the deal by various groups, along with plans by the U.S. government to try to block the merger, Comcast called off the deal in April 2015. On May 26, 2015, Charter Communications announced that it would acquire Time Warner Cable for $78.7 billion, along with Bright House Networks in a separate $10.1 billion deal, pending regulatory approval.[4]
The purchase was completed on May 18, 2016; Charter had continued to do business as Time Warner Cable in its former markets, but has now re-branded these operations under the Spectrum brand in most markets.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sale


2 Residential services
3 Business services
4 Cable Internet service
5 Naming rights

5.1 Current

5.1.1 Arena


5.2 Former

5.2.1 Fox Cities Stadium




6 Acquisitions

6.1 Adelphia
6.2 NaviSite
6.3 Insight Communications
6.4 DukeNet Communications


7 Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)
8 Venture with Sprint Nextel
9 Controversies

9.1 Bandwidth metering
9.2 Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography


10 Cable clusters
11 Divisions

11.1 West Region
11.2 East Region
11.3 Former divisions


12 Rankings
13 See also
14 References



History[edit]
Time Warner Cable was formed in 1992 by the merger of Time Inc.'s cable television company, American Television and Communications Corp. (service areas that had belonged to that company went under the Time Warner Communications name; since the 1990s, areas that had used that name have either been renamed to Time Warner Cable, Bright House Networks, or have been given to other cable providers), and Warner Cable, a division of Warner Communications, as a result of a merger to form Time Warner; for the two years after the merger, the companies operated separately but under the umbrella name "Time Warner Cable Group" (primarily due to 18% of ATC having been publicly owned at the time); they merged into one entity in 1992. It also includes the remnants of the defunct QUBE interactive TV service. In 1995, the company launched the Southern Tier On-Line Community, a cable modem service later known as Road Runner High Speed Online. That year, talks began that would later result in Warner's acquisition of Paragon Cable. Glenn Britt (1949–2014)[6][7] was the CEO from 2001 until December 2013.
Time Warner retained Time Warner Cable as a subsidiary until March 2009, when it was spun out as an independent company.[8] Prior to the spin-out, Time Warner had held an 84% stake in Time Warner Cable.[9] Non-Time Warner shareholders received 0.083670 shares for each share already owned. This move made Time Warner Cable the largest cable operator in the United States owned solely by a single class of shareholders (without supervoting stock).[10]
Time Warner Cable launched DVR service in the Houston area in 2004. (TWC's Houston-area cable systems are now owned by Comcast.) When first launched, it used Scientific-Atlanta set-top boxes with DVR.
In June 2009, Time Warner Cable unveiled a concept known as "TV Everywhere"—a means of allowing multi-platform access to live and on-demand content to content from television channels that is tied to a user's television subscription.[11][12]
Sale[edit]
Main article: Attempted purchase of Time Warner Cable by Comcast
It was first reported in October 2013 that Time Warner Cable was exploring a sale of the company, possibly to Charter Communications.[13] However, on November 22, 2013, reports surfaced that Comcast expressed interest in acquiring Time Warner Cable. Both companies were said to be placing bids for the company.[14] Charter reiterated its interest in purchasing Time Warner Cable and increased its bid on January 14, 2014. On February 12, 2014, it was reported that Comcast had reached a deal to acquire TWC in an overall deal valued at $45.2 billion, pending regulatory approval.[15]
The proposed merger was met with prominent opposition from various groups, showing concerns that the sheer size of the combined company would reduce competition and would give Comcast an unprecedented level of control over the United States' internet and television industries, increased leverage in the distribution of NBCUniversal content, hamper over-the-top services, and lead to higher prices for its services.[16][17][18][19] In April 2015, it was reported that the U.S. Department of Justice was preparing to file an antitrust lawsuit against the companies in a bid to halt the merger, primarily because the merged company would have controlled 57 percent of the nation's broadband capacity. On April 24, 2015, Comcast officially announced that it had called off the merger.[20][21]
On May 25, 2015, Bloomberg News reported that Charter was "near" a deal to acquire TWC for $195 a share.[22] Charter had been involved in the Comcast/TWC merger, as the companies planned to divest around 4 million subscribers to Charter in order to reduce the combined company's market share to an acceptable level.[23] The next day, Charter officially announced its intent to acquire Time Warner Cable in a deal valued at $78.7 billion, and confirmed that it would also continue with its proposed, $10.1 billion acquisition of Bright House Networks. The deal was subject to regulatory approval, although due to the relatively smaller size of the companies and their media holdings, the deal was expected to face less resistance than the Comcast/TWC merger.[24]
The acquisition was completed on May 18, 2016. The Time Warner Cable brand was phased out in favor of Spectrum, the brand used by Charter to market its services.[25][5][26]
Residential services[edit]
As of second quarter 2009, there were 14.6 million basic cable subscribers, 8.8 million Digital cable subscribers, 8.7 million Road Runner residential subscribers, 2.5 million DVR subscribers,[27] and 4.5 million residential Digital Phone subscribers, which makes it the fifth-largest landline phone provider in the United States.[28]
Business services[edit]
As of 2013, Time Warner Cable's business division had the second largest business-facing enterprise by revenue (of cable providers who offer business services), with $1.7 billion in revenue as of the third quarter of 2013. Total revenue for 2012 was $1.9 billion.[29]
Cable Internet service[edit]
Main article: Spectrum Internet
Naming rights[edit]
Current[edit]
Arena[edit]
Spectrum Center, formerly Time Warner Cable Arena, is located in Charlotte, North Carolina, the home of the NBA's Charlotte Hornets. In April 2008, the then-Bobcats reached a naming rights deal with Time Warner Cable, the Charlotte area's major cable television provider; the arena was named for the cable provider in exchange for the release of the team's television rights, which had been on the TWC co-owned Carolinas Sports Entertainment Television for its first season, which failed to find much cable coverage in the Charlotte market outside of Time Warner systems and went dark after a year, and then News 14 Carolina which was limited to only the North Carolina side of the market, until the arena naming rights deal was made. The team moved to the new Fox Sports South sub-feed Fox Sports Carolinas and SportSouth (now Fox Sports Southeast) with the 2008-09 season, allowing coverage through both the Carolinas.[30] Shortly after being acquired by Charter, the arena was renamed to Spectrum Center.
Former[edit]
Fox Cities Stadium[edit]
Main article: Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium
On March 9, 2007, Time Warner Cable, which provides service to the northeastern Wisconsin area, signed a 10-year naming rights deal. The field is home of the Wisconsin Timber Rattlers, a local minor league baseball team of the Midwest League and affiliate of the Milwaukee Brewers, based in Grand Chute, a suburb of Appleton. The team and Time Warner Cable mutually agreed to end the rights deal after the 2013 season, and the venue is now known as Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium, named for a local neurology practice.
Acquisitions[edit]
Adelphia[edit]
On July 31, 2007, Time Warner Cable and Comcast completed a deal to purchase practically all of Adelphia's assets for $17 billion.[31] Time Warner Cable gained 3.3 million of Adelphia's subscribers, a 29 percent increase, while Comcast gained almost 1.7 million subscribers. Adelphia stockholders received 16% of Time Warner Cable. Time Warner Cable went public effective February 13, 2007, and the company began trading on the New York Stock Exchange on March 1, 2007.[32]
In addition to Adelphia's coverage being divided up, Time Warner Cable and Comcast also agreed to exchange some of their own subscribers in order to consolidate key regions. An example of this is the Los Angeles market, which was mostly covered by Comcast and Adelphia (and some areas of the region already served by TWC), is now under Time Warner Cable. Philadelphia had been split between Time Warner and Comcast, with the majority of cable subscribers belonging to Comcast. Time Warner subscribers in Philadelphia were swapped with Comcast in early 2007. Similarly, the Houston area, which was under Time Warner, was swapped to Comcast, while the Dallas metro area was changed to Time Warner (RR).[33] In the Twin Cities, Minneapolis was Time Warner and Saint Paul was Comcast. That whole market is now Comcast.
NaviSite[edit]
Time Warner Cable purchased NaviSite (NAVI), a company providing cloud and hosting services, on February 1, 2011 for $230 million, roughly equating to $5.50 per share.[34]
Insight Communications[edit]
On August 13, 2011, Time Warner Cable announced its purchase of Insight Communications for $3 billion acquiring Insight's 760,000 subscribers nationwide. The merger was completed February 29, 2012, and as of June 2013 all of Insight Communications was absorbed into Time Warner Cable.[35]
DukeNet Communications[edit]
On October 7, 2013, Time Warner Cable announced that it has agreed to acquire DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million. DukeNet provides data and high-capacity bandwidth services to wireless carrier, data center, government, and enterprise customers in the Southeast.[36]
Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)[edit]
Some of the regional cable system clusters operated by Time Warner Cable are owned by the Time Warner Entertainment – Advance/Newhouse Partnership (TWEAN). In 2002, Advance/Newhouse Communications, unhappy with some of the operating policies of Time Warner Cable in the AOL Time Warner era, forced a restructuring of the TWEAN partnership such that Advance/Newhouse would actively manage and operate a portion of the jointly owned cable systems equal to their percentage of equity. Under this arrangement, Advance/Newhouse enjoys the proceeds of their actively managed systems rather than simply a percentage of the partnership's total earnings. The majority of the affected systems are in the Tampa and Orlando markets under the Bright House Networks brand.
The value of this deal is that it allows Advance/Newhouse to more directly control their cable investments without having to completely unravel the TWEAN partnership, which does bring some benefits via Time Warner's development and purchasing clout.
The transactions proposed by Charter were approved, TWC and Bright House Networks have been absorbed into Charter.[24]
Venture with Sprint Nextel[edit]
In late 2005, TWC and several other cable companies formed a venture with Sprint Nextel. This joint venture enables TWC customers to receive a full suite of products, linking in-home and out-of-home entertainment, information, and communications services. All of this was included in the new "Triple Play on the Go", similar to the Triple Play[discuss] but an addition of new services through Sprint Nextel.
Controversies[edit]
Bandwidth metering[edit]
In Beaumont, Texas, during 2008, Time Warner Cable began testing tier-based metered data plans that effectively placed customers into a pricing hierarchy based on the amount of data that they used, [clarification needed].[37] In 2009, Time Warner Cable announced that additional cities including Rochester, New York will become additional test sites. In particular in Rochester groups have formed to stop TWC. Several groups including Stop TWC[38] and Stop The Cap[39] are currently working to oppose these efforts. On April 7, 2009, then US Congressman Eric Massa called on Time Warner to eliminate its broadband Internet cap.[40]
Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography[edit]
On March 16, 2010, Time Warner Cable's transmission of their Kids on Demand and Kids Pre-School on Demand channels on systems in eastern North Carolina was interrupted by programming from the adult pay television channel Playboy TV for approximately two hours between 6:15 a.m. and 8:15 a.m./EDT, in which a group of nude women talked and posed in a sexually suggestive manner.[41] This accidental display affected Time Warner's digital cable subscribers in four towns in the system's eastern North Carolina cluster, while other areas displayed a black screen. A Time Warner spokesperson said in a statement to Raleigh CBS affiliate WRAL, "It was a technical malfunction that caused the wrong previews to be shown on our kids' on-demand channels. Unfortunately it hit at the worst possible time on the worst possible channels."[42] A Time Warner executive said normal monitoring procedures did not take effect because the glitch affected only a few areas. Customers were told to pay the small fee, and that their next bill would be reduced. [43]
Cable clusters[edit]




Time Warner Cable ident used until 2010. Remained in use on its "Business Class" division.



West Coast cluster

California – Barstow, Desert Cities, Orange County, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego
Hawaii (operating as Oceanic Time Warner Cable)


Midwest cluster

Kansas – Kansas City, Overland Park, Olathe, Shawnee
Missouri – Kansas City, Independence, Lee's Summit
Nebraska
Ohio – Akron, Bowling Green/North Baltimore, Canton, Cincinnati, Cleveland, Columbus, Dayton, Findlay/Lima, and Youngstown
Kentucky – Lexington, Louisville, Northern Kentucky, Ashland
Pennsylvania – Erie County, Sharon, Franklin
Wisconsin – Green Bay and Milwaukee


Northeast cluster

Maine
New Hampshire – Berlin, Keene
Massachusetts – Athol, Pittsfield
Upstate New York


The Carolinas cluster

North Carolina – Charlotte, Raleigh, Greensboro, and Wilmington
South Carolina – Columbia, Sumter, Florence, Summerville, Hilton Head and Myrtle Beach.


New York cluster

New Jersey – Bergen County, Hudson County
New York – New York City (Manhattan, Queens, Staten Island, most of western Brooklyn); Mount Vernon (Westchester County, rest of county is Cablevision)


Texas cluster

Texas – Arlington, Austin, Beaumont/Port Arthur, Corpus Christi, Dallas, El Paso, Harlingen, Killeen/Temple, Laredo, Rio Grande Valley, San Antonio, Waco, and Wichita Falls

coincidentally, the Irving-Grapevine-Coppell-Lewisville cluster had been under Time Warner Cable's control upon acquisition of Paragon Cable. This was prior to AT&T Broadband's full absorption of that cluster.




Not in a cluster (National)

Alabama – Dothan, Enterprise
Arizona – Yuma
California – El Centro
Colorado – Gunnison, Telluride
Idaho – Coeur d'Alene, Moscow
Indiana – Terre Haute
Virginia
Washington – Pullman
West Virginia – Clarksburg



Divisions[edit]
Time Warner Cable's divisions, from official website:
West Region[edit]




Former logo for "Oceanic Time Warner Cable" division



PAC West Region

Oceanic Time Warner Cable (Hawaii)
Time Warner Cable Desert Cities
Time Warner Cable San Diego
Time Warner Cable Southern California (SoCal)


Midwest Region

Time Warner Cable Kansas City
Time Warner Cable Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Northeast Ohio & Western Pennsylvania (Akron, Canton, Cleveland & Youngstown; Erie County & Sharon, PA)
Time Warner Cable Mid-Ohio (Columbus)
Time Warner Cable Southwest Ohio (Dayton; Cincinnati; Lexington, KY; Louisville, KY; Terre Haute, IN; Clarksburg, WV)
Time Warner Cable Wisconsin (Milwaukee & Green Bay)


Texas Region
Time Warner Cable National (non-clustered systems)

East Region[edit]




Time Warner Cable Spectrum.



Northeast Region

Time Warner Cable Albany
Time Warner Cable Buffalo
Time Warner Cable Rochester
Time Warner Cable Central New York / Syracuse
Time Warner Cable New England
Time Warner Cable New York City


Carolinas Region

Time Warner Cable Charlotte
Time Warner Cable Greensboro
Time Warner Cable Eastern Carolina
Time Warner Cable Raleigh
Time Warner Cable South Carolina (Columbia)
Time Warner Cable Fayetteville/Sandhills



Former divisions[edit]
Sold to Comcast

Time Warner Cable Houma
Time Warner Cable Houston
Time Warner Cable Lake City/Live Oak
Time Warner Cable Mid-South (Memphis, TN, AR, and MS)
Time Warner Cable Minnesota
Time Warner Cable Shreveport
Time Warner Cable St. Augustine/Palatka
Time Warner Cable Cape Coral/Naples

Divisions that became Bright House Networks

Time Warner Cable Central Florida[44]
Time Warner Cable Tampa Bay

Rankings[edit]
The American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI) ranked Time Warner Cable as one of the least liked companies in terms of customer satisfaction in 2011,[45] 2012,[46] 2013,[7][47] and 2014.[48]
See also[edit]

List of United States telephone companies
Spectrum Sports

References[edit]


^ "Top 25 Multichannel Video Service Customers (2012)". National Cable & Telecommunications Association. Retrieved 2013-01-02. 
^ "Investor Relations Contact Us." Time Warner Cable. Retrieved on March 6, 2010.
^ "Locations". Time Warner Cable. Archived from the original on July 16, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2012. 
^ Smith, Gerry (June 25, 2015). "Charter Promises Faster, Cheaper Internet to Win Merger Approval". Bloomberg. 
^ a b "So Long Time Warner Cable: Charter to Retire Much-Maligned Brand". Bloomberg. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Glenn Britt timeline" (PDF). 
^ a b Henry, David; Sherman, Alex (June 11, 2014). "Glenn Britt, Who Raised Time Warner Cable Shares, Dies at 65". Bloomberg. Retrieved September 6, 2014. 
^ "Time Warner Cable Spinoff to Finish Next Month". New York Times. February 27, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner's $9 Billion Cable Spinoff". CBS News. Associated Press. May 21, 2008. Retrieved May 23, 2008. 
^ "Time Warner Sets Final Distribution Ratio For Cable Spinoff". Dow Jones (via CNN Money). March 20, 2009. Retrieved March 27, 2009. [dead link]
^ Lasar, Matthew (June 24, 2009). "Is Comcast and TimeWarner's "TV Everywhere" TV for everyone?". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ Cheng, Jacqui (December 15, 2009). "Comcast expands online video to all cable+Internet customers". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ "Analyst: Charter, Time Warner Cable Merger Looks Probable". Fox Business.com. September 11, 2013. Retrieved September 11, 2013. 
^ Flint, Joe; James, Meg (November 22, 2013). "Charter Communications and Comcast may battle for Time Warner Cable". New York Times. Retrieved November 22, 2013. 
^ Baker, Liana B. (February 13, 2014). "CORRECTED-UPDATE 7-Comcast takeover of Time Warner Cable to reshape U.S. pay TV". Reuters. Retrieved 13 February 2014. 
^ "Netflix Says It Opposes Comcast’s Merger Bid". The New York Times. 21 Apr 2014. Retrieved 25 Apr 2014. 
^ "More Than 50 Public Interest Groups Speak Out Against the Comcast-Time Warner Cable Merger". Freepress.net. 8 Apr 2014. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Julian Hattem (24 Mar 2014). "Writers Guild protests Comcast-Time Warner deal". The Hill. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Ira Teinowitz (9 Apr 2014). "Consumer Group Slams Comcast, Time-Warner Deal at New Senate Hearing (Updated)". The Wrap. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ "Comcast/TWC merger may be blocked by Justice Department". Ars Technica. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Comcast / Time Warner Cable / Charter Transactions Terminated – Comcast Press Statement". Comcast. Retrieved 24 April 2015. 
^ Sherman, Alex (25 May 2015). "Charter Near Deal for Time Warner Cable at $195 a Share". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 25 May 2015. 
^ McGrath, Maggie (28 April 2014). "Comcast Strikes Deal With Charter To Divest Nearly 4 Million Subscribers". Forbes. Retrieved 9 June 2014. 
^ a b Steel, Emily (May 26, 2015). "Charter Communications Agrees to Acquire Time Warner Cable". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Charter completes purchase of Time Warner Cable, Bright House". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Charter introduces Spectrum brand in Southern California". Los Angeles Times. September 20, 2016. Retrieved September 21, 2016. 
^ "About Us - Time Warner Cable's Company History and News". 
^ Leichtman Research Group, "Research Notes," First Quarter 2012, pg. 6, Time Warner (#5) with 4,544,000 residential phone lines.
^ "Heavy Reading: Cable Biz Sales to Hit $8.5B | Light Reading". 
^ "Deals widen Bobcats' TV reach". Charlotte.com. April 9, 2008. Retrieved April 16, 2008. 
^ "CNNMoney.com: Time Warner to save on programming costs after Adelphia Deal – Jul, 31. 2006". CNN. July 31, 2006. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Press Release: Time Warner Cable Becomes a Public Company". Timewarner.com. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ Ehling, Jeff (August 2, 2006). "Time-Warner Cable leaving Houston". KTRK-TV. American Broadcasting Company. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Cable buys NaviSite as hosting acquisitions pick up". zdnet.com. February 1, 2011. Retrieved August 21, 2011. 
^ "Lexington, KY local and state news by the Lexington Herald-Leader – Kentucky.com". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Time Warner Cable to acquire Regional Fiber Optic Network Company DukeNet Communications". Retrieved 8 October 2013. 
^ Lawson, Stephen (January 18, 2008). "Time Warner to Try Tiered Cable Pricing". IDG News Service. PC World. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ "Stop TWC – More Info Coming Soon! Please Check Back!". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Stop the Cap!". Stop the Cap!. Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ Massa, Eric. "Congressman Eric Massa calls on Time Warner to eliminate Broadband Internet Cap". Archived from the original on April 9, 2009. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ Pearson, Erica (March 17, 2010). "Time Warner apologizes for accidentally showing Playboy previews on kiddie channels in N.C". Daily News. New York. 
^ Davis, Stacy (2010-03-16). "Time Warner apologizes for Playboy-kids channel glitch". WRAL.com. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ [1] Archived February 3, 2013, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Time Warner Cable changes name to Bright House". Orlando Business Journal. American City Business Journals. March 7, 2003. 
^ Lubin, Gus; Vivian Giang (2011-06-29). "The 19 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ Spector, Dina; Gus Lubin; Vivian Giang (2012-06-22). "The 15 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ "Benchmarks by Companies: All Companies". American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI). 
^ Fottrell, Quentin (December 31, 2014). "The most unpopular company in America is …". MarketWatch. Retrieved January 25, 2015. 








v
t
e


Charter Communications



Leadership



Thomas M. Rutledge (CEO)





Internet properties



Spectrum Internet





Cable
television
channels




News channels



Austin
Buffalo
Capital Region
Central NY
Florida

Bay News 9
News 13
InfoMás


New York City

NY1
NY1 Noticias
NY1 Rail and Road


North Carolina
Rochester





Sports channels



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet/Deportes LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





Local / Regional



Charter TV3 (Worcester)
Spectrum Community

Maine
Southern California


Spectrum OC16 (Hawaii)













Links to related articles











v
t
e


Liberty Interactive



Liberty Interactive Group



Bodybuilding.com (83%)
BuySeasons
CommerceHub (99%)
Evite
Gifts.com
HSN (34%)
Provide Commerce (ProFlowers)
QVC

Zulily


Right Start





Liberty Ventures Group



Expedia, Inc. (18%)
Interval International (30%)
Tree.com (25%)
TripAdvisor (26%)












v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other specialty television providers in the United States



Cable MVPD



Adams Cable
Allegiance Communications
Altice USA

Optimum
Suddenlink Communications


Armstrong
Atlantic Broadband
Blue Ridge Communications
Blue Stream
Broadstripe
Buckeye Broadband
Cable One
Charter Spectrum
Comcast Xfinity
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


Cox Communications
Docomo Pacific
Emery Telcom
Full Channel
GCI
Hargray
Layer3 TV
Mediacom
Midco
Northland Communications
OneLink Communications
Satview Broadband
Service Electric
SRT Communications
TDS Telecom
TPG

Grande Communications
RCN Corporation
Wave Broadband


TruVista Communications
WOW!





Satellite MVPD



Claro
Dish Network
DirecTV
Glorystar
Headend in the Sky
Home2US





Fiber MVPD / IPTV



AT&T U-verse
CenturyLink Prism TV
Cincinnati Bell FiOptics
Claro
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


EPB
Frontier FiOS
Google Fiber
GTA Teleguam
Hawaiian Telcom
Layer3 TV
Midco
NEP Datastream TV
TDS Telecom
Verizon FiOS
Windstream Kinetic





Virtual MVPD



DirecTV Now
FuboTV
Hulu with Live TV
PlayStation Vue
Skitter TV
Sling TV
YouTube TV





Over-the-top



Amazon Video
Anime Network
Apple TV (iTunes Store)
CBS All Access
Crackle
Crunchyroll
CW Seed
CuriosityStream
DramaFever
Fandor
Feeln
FunimationNow
go90
HBO Now
History Vault
Hulu
iON (IPTV)
Lifetime Movie Club
Netflix
Noggin
Pluto TV
Roku
Seeso
Showtime
StarzPlay
Tribeca Shortlist
Tubi TV
Univision NOW
Yupptv





Defunct cable



Adelphia Communications Corporation
Alameda Power and Telecom1
Astound Broadband
AT&T Broadband

MediaOne / Continental Cablevision
Tele-Communications Inc.


Baja Broadband

US Cable


Bresnan Communications
Bright House Networks
Cablevision
Champion Broadband
Cobridge Communications
Community Home Entertainment
Graceba Total Communications
Insight Communications
Jones Intercable
King Videocable
Knology
Marcus Cable
NPG Cable
Paragon Cable
Rapid Communications
TelePrompTer / Group W Cable
Time Warner Cable
UA-Columbia Cablevision
Windjammer Communications

1 – Still in operation, but no longer offers cable or Internet as part of its services




Defunct satellite



AlphaStar
GlobeCast World TV
PrimeStar
United States Satellite Broadcasting
Voom HD Networks





Defunct IPTV



Sky Angel
Virtual Digital Cable





Defunct terrestrial



Aereo
USDTV
MovieBeam





See also



Radio spectrum pollution












v
t
e


Additional resources on North American television



North America



List of local television stations in North America
DTV transition
North American TV mini-template





Canada



Canadian networks
List of Canadian television networks
List of Canadian television channels
List of Canadian specialty channels
Local Canadian TV stations
List of United States stations available in Canada
2001 Vancouver TV realignment
2007 Canada broadcast TV realignment





Mexico



Mexican networks
Local Mexican TV stations





United States



American networks
List of American cable and satellite networks
List of American over-the-air networks
Local American TV stations (W)
Local American TV stations (K)
Spanish-language TV networks
1994 United States broadcast TV realignment
2006 United States broadcast TV realignment
List of Canadian television stations available in the United States
Insular Areas TV











Africa, Asia, and Oceania
Americas
Europe












v
t
e


Sports television in the United States



Broadcast
divisions





English




American Sports Network
CBS Sports
ESPN on ABC
Fox Sports
NBC Sports
Turner Sports






Spanish




Azteca
Telemundo Deportes (Telemundo/Universo)
Univision Deportes








National
channels





English




beIN Sports
CBS Sports Network
ESPN

ESPN2


FS1

FS2


NBCSN
Olympic Channel






Spanish




beIN Sports en Español
ESPN Deportes
Fox Deportes
Univision Deportes Network








Specialty
channels





College




Big Ten Network
ESPNU
Fox College Sports
Longhorn Network
Pac-12 Network
SEC Network






Single sport




Cricket TicketO
ESPN College Extra
ESPN Goal Line/Buzzer BeaterP
Fox Soccer PlusP
GOL TV
Golf Channel
In DemandP
MAVTV
MLB Network
MLB Extra InningsO
MLB Strike ZoneP
MLS Direct KickO
NBA League PassO
NBA TV
NFL Network
NFL RedZoneP
NFL Sunday TicketO
NHL Network
NHL Center IceO
Tennis Channel
TVG

TVG2


Willow






Outdoors




Frost Great Outdoors
Outdoor Channel
Pursuit Channel
Sportsman Channel
World Fishing Network






Other




Eleven Sports Network
ESPN Classic
ESPNews
ESPN PPVP
Ride TV








Syndicators



ACC Network (Raycom Sports)
ESPN Events





Broadband



Fox Sports Go
MLB.tv
UFC Fight Pass
WatchESPN (ESPN3)
WWE Network
WWNLive





Video on demand



The Ski Channel
Surf Channel













v
t
e


Regional sports television networks in the United States



AT&T SportsNet



Northwest
Pittsburgh
Rocky Mountain
Southwest
Utah





Fox Sports Networks



Arizona
Detroit
Florida / Sun
Midwest

Indiana
Kansas City


North
Ohio / SportsTime Ohio
Southeast / South

Carolinas
Tennessee


Southwest

Oklahoma
New Orleans


West / Prime Ticket

San Diego


Wisconsin
YES Network





NBC Sports Regional Networks
(Comcast)



Bay Area
California
Chicago
Mid-Atlantic
New England
Northwest

Oregon Sports Network


Philadelphia





Spectrum Sports
(Charter)



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





YurView (Cox)



Arizona
California
Kansas
Las Vegas
Louisiana
New England
Oklahoma
Virginia





Independents



Altitude Sports
Buckeye Cable Sports
BYUtv Sports
Cox Sports TV
FiOS1
Longhorn Network
Mid-Atlantic Sports
Midco Sports
MSG Network

Plus
Western NY


NESN
SportsNet NY
SWX Right Now


















v
t
e


Defunct television sports networks in the United States



National



America One
American Sports Classics
Back9Network
Baseball Network
Big 12 Network
CNN SI
ESPN 3D
Football Network
Fox Soccer
Lorimar Sports Network
Mizlou
NASCAR Hot Pass
NewSport
One World Sports
ONTV
SEC TV
Speed
SportsChannel America
Sports Network
Universal Sports Network





Regional



4SD
Carolinas SE
Cox Sports
Empire
Hawkvision
MountainWest
PASS Sports
Prime
PRISM
Royals Sports
SportsChannel LA
Sportsvision
Sports Time
Victory





Out-of-market



ESPN Full Court
ESPN GamePlan
Mega March Madness











O. Out-of-market sports packages P. Premium channel













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Time_Warner_Cable&oldid=792249246"					
Categories: Time Warner CableCable television companies of the United StatesCompanies based in Fairfield County, ConnecticutEntertainment companies established in 1973Media companies established in 1973Media companies disestablished in 2016Media companies of the United States1973 establishments in the United States2016 disestablishments in the United StatesCompanies formerly listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFormer Time Warner subsidiariesVoIP companies of the United States2016 acquisitionsCorporate spin-offsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2010Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from June 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaNederlands日本語Simple EnglishSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 12:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Regulatory - Federal and State Tariffs





































Home
Time Warner Cable Terms & Conditions


Regulatory & Carrier Relations











 



Regulatory


State and Federal Tariffs
Carrier Relations




This page provides access to tariffs filed by various Time Warner Cable affiliates with the Federal Communications Commission (“FCC”) and state regulatory authorities, as indicated. Tariffs describe the rates, terms and conditions that apply to certain regulated telecommunications services offered by Time Warner Cable affiliates.

Alabama
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Alabama), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
AL Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS AL FCC Tariff No1
AL TWCB IXC Tariff
Arizona
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Arizona), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCB Arizona IXC Tariff 
TWCIS AZ PUC Intrastate Tariff No. 1 
TWCIS AZ FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
California
Time Warner Cable Information Services (California), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS CA FCC PUC No. 5-T 
TWCIS CA Tariff No. 1 Access Services
TWCIS CA PUC Tariff - Competitive Local Carrier Services
Colorado
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Colorado), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS CO PUC Tariff No 1 Local Interconnection Service
TWCIS CO PUC Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS CO FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Florida
Time Warner Cable Business LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
FL TRF LOCAL 2014 0611 CUR01
Hawaii
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Hawaii), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS HI PUC Tariff No. 2 - Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS HI PUC Tariff No. 3 Intrastate Access Services
HI Tariff PUC 1 IXC Telecom
TWCIS HI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Idaho
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Idaho), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
ID Tariff No 1 Intrastat Access Service
TWCIS ID FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
ID Tariff IXC Telecom Price List
Illinois
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Illinois), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
Illinois C.C. Tariff No. 1 - Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS IL CC Tariff No2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS IL FCC Tariff No1
IL CC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
Indiana
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Indiana), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
IN Tariff No 1 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS IN Tariff Access Services
Kansas
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Kansas), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TWCIS KS FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Kentucky
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Kentucky), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS KY Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS KY PSC Tariff No. 2
TWCIS KY FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Maine
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Maine), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
ME Tariff No 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS ME PUC Tariff No1 Local Interconnection Service
TWCIS ME Tariff Access Services
Massachusetts
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Massachusetts), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS MA M.D.T.E. No. 1 Local and Interexchange Service Tariff
TWCIS MA M.D.T.C. No. 2 Intrastate Access Service Tariff
TWCIS MA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Michigan
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Michigan), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
M.P.S.C. No. 1 Local Exchange Service
M.P.S.C. No. 2 Interexchange Service
M.P.S.C. No. 3 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS MI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Missouri
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Missouri), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS MO PSC No. 5 Competitive Access Services
TWCIS MO PSC Tariff No4 Local and Interexchange Services
TWCIS MO FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Nebraska), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
P.S.C. Tariff No. 1 Competitive Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS NE PSC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NE FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
New Hampshire
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Hampshire), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NH PUC Rate Schedule No. 2
TWCIS NH PUC Rate Schedule No3
TWCIS NH Tariff Access Services 
New Jersey
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Jersey), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NJ Tariff No. 1 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NJ Tariff No. 2 Local Exchange Service
TWCIS NJ FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
New Mexico
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New Mexico), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NM Tariff No. 1 Interexchange Service
TWCIS NM Tariff No. 2 Local Service
TWCIS NM PRC Tariff No. 3 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NM FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
NM CC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
New York
Time Warner Cable Information Services (New York), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NY P.S.C. No. 2 Telephone Access Services 
TWCIS NY P.S.C. No. 3 Local and Interexchange Telecommunications
TWCIS NY FCC Tariff Access Service
NY PSC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
North Carolina
Time Warner Cable Information Services (North Carolina), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS NC Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS NC Tariff Access Services
Ohio
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Ohio), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
OH Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TWCIS OH Tariff Access Services
Pennsylvania
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Pennsylvania), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
PA P.U.C. Tariff No. 1 Competitive Local Exchange Carrier
TWCIS PA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
PAPUC Tariff No2 Switched Access Tariff
PA PUC Tariff No1 CAP
South Carolina
Time Warner Cable Information Services (South Carolina), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS SC Tariff No. 1 Local and Interexchange
TWCIS SC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS SC FCC Tariff No. 1
SC Tariff No1 IXC Telecom
Tennessee
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Tenessee), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable.
Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Services Tariff
TN Tariff Packaged Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS TN Tariff Access Services
Texas
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Texas), LLC Texas d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS TX PUC Tariff No. 1 Local & Interexchange Service
TWCIS TX PUC Tariff No. 2 Intrastate Access Service
TWCIS TX FCC Tariff No. 2 Access Service
Virginia
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Virginia), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS FCC Tariff Access Services
TWCB_VA_Price_List
TWCIS VA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Service
Washington
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Washington), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable.
TWCIS WA Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS WA FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
West Virginia
Time Warner Cable Information Services (West Virginia), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
W.V.P.S.C. No. 1 Competitive Local and Interexchange Service
TWCIS WV FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services
TWCIS WV Tariff No2 Intrastate Access Services
WV PSC Interexchange Service No1
Wisconsin
Time Warner Cable Information Services (Wisconsin), LLC d/b/a Time Warner Cable
TWCIS Wisconsin Tariff No. 1 Intrastate Access Services
TWCIS WI FCC Tariff No. 1 Access Services







This document will assist Trading Partners of Time Warner Cable (TWC) in gaining access to the TWC GUI and placing Local Service Requests (LSRs) for porting numbers.






1. Purpose and Audience 


This user guide is directed to those personnel responsible for submitting industry requests to Time Warner Cable (TWC), including order entry and management for number portability.  This document provides guidelines for accessing the TWC graphical user interface (GUI), placing port orders and requirements for one day simple ports, and placing standard or complex port orders.





2. Getting Started


To access the TWC GUI and place a Local Service Request (LSR) for porting out numbers, a carrier must have a user ID and password. Each Trading Partner must complete and submit a Trading Partner Summary and Porting Information forms to: 
Carrier@twcable.com
Once the user ID and password are assigned, the carrier may access the TWC GUI at https://twc-port.neustar.com/gateway/.





3. Ordering Guidelines


The following are guidelines for completing and submitting LSRs to TWC for the purpose of porting a TN away from TWC. 

The end user name and address provided on the End User Form must exactly match the service address and location section of the Customer Service Inquiry response for all TWC commercial accounts.
The operating company number (OCN)/state should be selected based off the numbering plan area (NPA) of the telephone number being requested.  TWC will only port telephone numbers that are used for two-way communication.
Telephone numbers not converted by the new number service provider (NNSP) do not need to be addressed on the LSR. TWC will not disconnect unwanted TNs identified on a LSR port request. The customer will need to contact TWC directly (identified on the bill) to arrange for disconnection of any unwanted TNs.
Desired due dates over 30 calendar days from the submitted date will not be accepted.
Rejected LSRs will be cancelled after five business days. LSR charges may apply pursuant to the terms of the applicable industry agreement.
If you feel your LSR has been improperly rejected, send an e-mail to twc.serviceordersupport@twcable.com
LSRs containing more than 20 telephone numbers, unless otherwise stated in your industry agreement, will be handled as a project. Both parties will negotiate implementation details, including due date/time. 

Project requests should be emailed to twc.serviceordersupport@twcable.com. 
The subject line should state: Project Request/ATN/AN. The body of the email should include the number of telephone numbers porting, desired due date (DDD), and the purchase order number (PON) to be submitted. 
Once approved, TWC will respond with a project code to be placed in the project field (field 20) on the LSR. LSRs submitted with more than 20 telephone numbers that do not include the approved project code will be rejected. LSRs submitted as a project are subject to normal LSR validation.


                                             
                                        




4. Simple Ports 


This section addresses wireline-to-wireline and intermodal ports.  Intermodal refers to ports between wireline and wireless providers.  Simple Ports:

Involve a single line account only 
Do not involve unbundled network elements (no loop with number port) 
Do not include complex switch translations such as Centrex, direct inward dialing (DID) numbers, or Advanced Intelligent Network (AIN) service 
Do not include remote call forwarding numbers 
Do not include multiple services on the loop such as broadband or other data services 
Do not include a line that has been resold






4.1  Simple Port Validation Fields


The four fields that can be required for validation are: 

Customer account number 
Zip code 
Telephone number to be ported 
Pass code *
Do not include multiple services on the loop such as broadband or other data services 

Note: The pass code field is optional unless the pass code has been requested and   assigned by the end user.





4.2  Simple Port Required Fields


The following information fields should be completed to facilitate processing of the LSR.

Ported Telephone Number:  identifies the telephone number or consecutive range of telephone numbers residing in the same switch to be ported.
Account Number:  identifies the account number assigned by the new service provider.
Zip Code:  identifies the zip code of the end user’s service address and validates that the correct user’s number has been sent on the port request.
Company Code:  identifies the exchange carrier initiating the transaction
New Network Service Provider (Conditional): identifies the Number Portability Administration Center (NPAC) service provider identifier (SPI) of the new provider.
Desired Due Date (DDD):  identifies the customer’s desired due date for the port
Purchase Order Number (PON):  identifies the customer’s unique purchase order or requisition number that authorizes issuance of the request or supplement.
Version (Conditional): identifies the submitting service provider’s order version number and enables service providers to track orders internally and make changes or modifications. 
Number Portability Direction Indicator:  allows the new service provider to direct the correct administration of E-911 records.
Customer Carrier Name Abbreviation:  three-letter code that identifies the company that submitted the LSR and the company to whom response messages must be returned.
Requisition Type and Status:  specifies the type of order to be processed.
Activity:  identifies the activity involved in the service request.
Telephone Number of the Initiator:  provides the telephone number for the initiator of the port request.
Agency Authority Status:  indicates that the customer is acting as an end user’s agent and has an authorization on file. 






4.3  LSR Simple Port Rules


 




4.3.1  Business Days for Simple Ports


Business Days for Simple Ports Business days are Monday through Friday, 8am – 5pm local time, excluding weekends and holidays.
The cutoff time for receipt of a valid simple port LSR in order for the simple port to be eligible for activation at 12:00am on the following business day is 1:00pm. 
The NPAC has seven regions that cover the United States. The times referenced above are based on local time in the predominant time zone of the NPAC Region that contains the number to be ported.

Northeast NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Mid-Atlantic NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Southeast NPAC Region:  Eastern time
Midwest NPAC Region:  Central time 
Southwest NPAC Region:  Central time
West Coast NPAC Region:  Pacific time
Western NPAC Region:  Mountain time






4.3.2  Non-Qualifying Simple Ports


After determining that a simple port request is non-simple, TWC may issue a firm order commitment (FOC) within four hours with a different due date if the LSR contains sufficient data for a non-simple port. If the LSR contains insufficient data, it may be rejected.
The final determination as to whether a port out request is a simple port is made by TWC, consistent with the applicable regulations.






4.4 FOC Intervals



Simple Port: LSR-to-FOC Intervals
All simple port LSRs received by the 1:00pm cutoff time will be responded to (FOC or reject) within four clock hours. Simple port LSRs received after the 1:00pm cutoff will be considered to have been received on the following business day. 

Simple Port: LSR-to-FOC Intervals
(Illustration)





Accurate/Complete Local Service Request (LSR) Received
Firm Order Confirmation (FOC) or Reject Due Back by Day/Time


Mon 8:00am through 8:59am
Mon 12:00pm (noon) through 12:59pm


Mon 9:00am through 9:59am
Mon 1:00pm through 1:59pm


Mon 10:00am through 10:59am
Mon 2:00pm through 2:59pm


Mon 11:00am through 11:59am
Mon 3:00pm through 3:59pm


Mon 12:00pm (noon) through 12:59pm
Mon 4:00pm through 4:59pm


Mon 1:00pm
Mon 5:00pm


Mon 1:01pm through Tues 7:59am
Tues 12:00pm (noon)








5. Complex/Commercial Porting Orders


A Complex port out request may contain 1 to 20 telephone numbers.  Port out requests for more than 20 telephone numbers constitute a project and the interval will be negotiated.
Account number (AN), end user account number (EAN), and account telephone number (ATN) are required to process a Complex LSR. The AN and EAN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account number and the ATN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account TN.





5.1   Validation Fields


All complex port out orders must carry the TWC required combination of the five field decision validations:

Account number
End user last name
End user service address house number
TN
ZIP





5.  Complex/Commercial Porting Orders


A Complex port out request may contain 1 to 20 telephone numbers.  Port out requests for more than 20 telephone numbers constitute a project and the interval will be negotiated.
Account number (AN), end user account number (EAN), and account telephone number (ATN) are required to process a Complex LSR. The AN and EAN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account number and the ATN should be populated with the customer’s TWC account TN.




5.2    LSR Address Fields


The following fields are included on the TWC GUI.  Please See TWC Field Level LSR Guide for Required verses Conditional fields. 

SAPR (Street Address Number Prefix)
SANO (Service Address Number)
SASF (Service Address Number Suffix)
SASD (Service Address Street Directional Prefix)
SASN (Service Address Street Name)
SASS (Service Address Street Directional Suffix)
SATH (Service Address Street Directional Suffix)
CITY  (Service Address City)
STATE (Service Address State)
ZIP (Service Address Zip)






5.3   Ordering Information


Following are guidelines intended to assist in placing LSRs for Porting numbers out from Time Warner Cable.

Port orders received in complex format must pass complex edits prior to resolving one day vs. complex to determine due date.  DDD for non-simple ports must be a minimum of three business days from the LSR submission date. If the LSR is submitted before 3pm EST this will count as day one. LSRs submitted after 3pm EST are considered to be received the next business day.  The NNSP field is required on all requests for number portability.
In instances where the LSR indicates the port request is non-simple based on the current FCC definition and rule for a simple port, TWC will return a FOC or appropriate response within 24 clock hours.
TWC creates the SV in NPAC for number portability requests.
The NNSP will be responsible for concurring with the SV in order to proceed with the porting process.
Where technically feasible, TWC will apply the ten-digit trigger (TDT) to all TNs being ported out. The TDT will be placed in the switch the day prior to the FOC due date. If the parties agree to a coordinated hot cut, TWC will allow the NNSP 30 minutes from the desired frame due time to activate the telephone number in NPAC. If 30 minutes expires and the TN has not been activated, TWC will rewrite the internal order and send a cancellation notice via TWC GUI. If any of the telephone numbers need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
If a coordinated hot cut is not requested, numbers activated by the NNSP in NPAC will be removed from the TWC switch the day following activation by the NNSP.  Telephone numbers will not be removed from the TWC switch until the NPAC version has been activated by the NNSP.
The FOC is only good for five business days past the due date on the FOC. The NPAC SV will be cancelled the sixth day following the FOC due date if activation has not occurred in NPAC or if a supplemental LSR has not been submitted. TWC will rewrite the internal order and send a cancellation notice via TWC GUI. If any of the canceled TNs need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
When a disconnection activity type is submitted for a TWC native TN, the number must be in a pending-disconnect status in NPAC.
Any port out order of more than 20 lines requires a negotiated due date and may require a coordinated cutover.  The NNSP must contact TWC to negotiate the due date and the necessity of a coordinated cutover.  For orders of more than 20 lines, contact TWC Carrier Relations Organization at: carrier@twcable.com.
LSR status (FOC or cancel) will be provided within 24 hours of receipt for requests with 1 to 20 TNs. For LSRs containing over 20 TNs, responses will be sent within 72 hours of receipt. These intervals are not applicable in cases where states have specific interval rules associated with this activity. 
Requests with one stand-a-lone residential telephone number will be assigned a FOC date of four business days from the day a clean LSR was received. Requests with 1 to 20 TNs will be assigned a FOC date of 5 business days to complete the procedure from the day a clean LSR was received. TWC considers port out requests of more than 20 TNs a project and the interval will be negotiated. A response will be received within 48 hours informing of the due date issued. The regional office will review the request and provide FOC as appropriate to the size and complexity of the request via the normal confirmation process. 





5.4  Supplement Requests


If the order is in FOC “Accept”, then changing the due date for less than five business days does not require a supplement. TWC will accept a supplement up to 3pm EST the day before the due date or FOC expiration date.   The NNSP must issue a supplemental order to TWC to identify any modifications to the original request.  All modifications to the original request will impact the original confirmed due date. Supplement requests received on the desired due date can experience technical difficulties; therefore, it is recommended that supplements be sent 24 hours prior to the desired due date.



5.5  Partial Port Indicator


A partial port out affects only the telephone numbers identified on the NNSP’s LSR.  The TNs not identified on the LSR remain in service with TWC and are billed appropriately. To assist with the identification and proper processing of partial port out orders, TWC requests the population of a full/partial port indicator on the LSR by the NNSP.
Note: TWC does not accept expedited port out requests (advancing the standard DD) from any service provider, unless there is a service-impacting situation caused by TWC. 



5.6  Service Restrictions


The following service restrictions apply when porting out from TWC:

Ported TNs port within the constraints placed on them by the FCC and specific state regulations. 
The numbers listed below are examples of numbers, which are not portable, as well as their underlying provisioned TN:

555, 960 and 976 NXXs
500, 700, 900, 911 services
Other N11 codes (e.g. 411, 511)

Numbers used for mass calling events cannot be ported.
The TWC policy, regarding the porting of reserved TNs, is to allow porting when reserved numbers are on the end-user service record.
Porting service request restricted on unassigned, previously owned, disconnected, disconnected following suspension for non-payment, or numbers associated with paging services cannot be ported.




5.7  Expedited LSRs


TWC does not accept expedited port requests (advancing the standard DD interval) unless there is a service-impacting situation.  TWC will only consider support of an expedited port on an individual case basis with particular focus on preventing the customer from being out of service.  NNSP must notify and receive approval from the CLEC Operations contact before advancing the due date. If approval is received to advance the DDD less than the standard LSR interval (three days), the expedite field must be populated with a Y.



5.8  Cancellations


For service assurance, it is best to submit cancel requests (SUP1) by 3pm EST the day before the due date or FOC expiration date.  For anything after 3pm the day before, contact:

For residential and commercial orders:  CLEC Operations at 877-594-6039, select option 1, and TWC will try their best to accommodate.

Note: For special projects service assurance, TWC must receive the cancel request (SUP1) by 3pm two days prior to the due date to prevent service interruption.



5.8.1  Same Day Cancellation Contact


For same day cancellations, or next day cancellations submitted after 3pm, submit the cancel request (SUP1) and call TWC to notify of cancellation.  For residential and commercial cancellations, call CLEC Operations at 877-594-6039.



5.8.2  Cancel FOC Policy


TNs not activated at NPAC within five business days from the FOC due date will be canceled by TWC (SPID 853C).  TWC will cancel the subscription at NPAC and issue a cancellation notice to the former NNSP.  If any of the canceled numbers need to be ported, a new LSR will be required by the NNSP to process the request.
















^ Back to Top











Time Warner Cable - Wikipedia






















 






Time Warner Cable

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Time Warner Cable Inc.


Time Warner Cable's final logo used until the acquisition with Charter Communications.




Former type

Subsidiary


Industry
Telecommunications
Mass media


Fate
Acquired by Charter Communications


Successor
Spectrum


Founded
1973; 44 years ago (1973)


Founder
Time Warner
(merger of Time Inc. & Warner Communications)


Defunct
2016; 1 year ago (2016)


Headquarters
Time Warner Center, New York City, New York, United States



Area served

United States



Key people

Robert D. Marcus
(Chairman & CEO)


Parent
Warner Communications (1973–1990)
Time Warner (1990-2009) Charter Communications (2016-Present)


Subsidiaries
Time Warner Cable Enterprises LLC






Time Warner Center, formerly the headquarters of the company in New York City. It was shared by its namesake, but now unrelated company, Time Warner.






Time Warner Cable building entrance in Morrisville, North Carolina


Time Warner Cable (TWC) was an American cable television company. Prior to its purchase by Charter Communications in 2016, it was ranked the second largest cable company in the United States by revenue behind only Comcast, operating in 29 states.[1] Its corporate headquarters were located in the Time Warner Center in Midtown Manhattan, New York City,[2] with other corporate offices in Stamford, Connecticut; Charlotte, North Carolina; and Herndon, Virginia.[3]
It was controlled by Warner Communications, then by Time Warner (the film and television production company and cable channel operator). That company spun off the cable operations in March 2009 as part of a larger restructuring. From 2009 to 2016, Time Warner Cable was an entirely independent company, continuing to use the Time Warner name under license from its former parent (including the "Road Runner" name for its Internet service, now Spectrum Internet).
In 2014, the company was the subject of a proposed purchase by Comcast Corporation, valued at $45.2 billion; however, following opposition to the deal by various groups, along with plans by the U.S. government to try to block the merger, Comcast called off the deal in April 2015. On May 26, 2015, Charter Communications announced that it would acquire Time Warner Cable for $78.7 billion, along with Bright House Networks in a separate $10.1 billion deal, pending regulatory approval.[4]
The purchase was completed on May 18, 2016; Charter had continued to do business as Time Warner Cable in its former markets, but has now re-branded these operations under the Spectrum brand in most markets.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sale


2 Residential services
3 Business services
4 Cable Internet service
5 Naming rights

5.1 Current

5.1.1 Arena


5.2 Former

5.2.1 Fox Cities Stadium




6 Acquisitions

6.1 Adelphia
6.2 NaviSite
6.3 Insight Communications
6.4 DukeNet Communications


7 Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)
8 Venture with Sprint Nextel
9 Controversies

9.1 Bandwidth metering
9.2 Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography


10 Cable clusters
11 Divisions

11.1 West Region
11.2 East Region
11.3 Former divisions


12 Rankings
13 See also
14 References



History[edit]
Time Warner Cable was formed in 1992 by the merger of Time Inc.'s cable television company, American Television and Communications Corp. (service areas that had belonged to that company went under the Time Warner Communications name; since the 1990s, areas that had used that name have either been renamed to Time Warner Cable, Bright House Networks, or have been given to other cable providers), and Warner Cable, a division of Warner Communications, as a result of a merger to form Time Warner; for the two years after the merger, the companies operated separately but under the umbrella name "Time Warner Cable Group" (primarily due to 18% of ATC having been publicly owned at the time); they merged into one entity in 1992. It also includes the remnants of the defunct QUBE interactive TV service. In 1995, the company launched the Southern Tier On-Line Community, a cable modem service later known as Road Runner High Speed Online. That year, talks began that would later result in Warner's acquisition of Paragon Cable. Glenn Britt (1949–2014)[6][7] was the CEO from 2001 until December 2013.
Time Warner retained Time Warner Cable as a subsidiary until March 2009, when it was spun out as an independent company.[8] Prior to the spin-out, Time Warner had held an 84% stake in Time Warner Cable.[9] Non-Time Warner shareholders received 0.083670 shares for each share already owned. This move made Time Warner Cable the largest cable operator in the United States owned solely by a single class of shareholders (without supervoting stock).[10]
Time Warner Cable launched DVR service in the Houston area in 2004. (TWC's Houston-area cable systems are now owned by Comcast.) When first launched, it used Scientific-Atlanta set-top boxes with DVR.
In June 2009, Time Warner Cable unveiled a concept known as "TV Everywhere"—a means of allowing multi-platform access to live and on-demand content to content from television channels that is tied to a user's television subscription.[11][12]
Sale[edit]
Main article: Attempted purchase of Time Warner Cable by Comcast
It was first reported in October 2013 that Time Warner Cable was exploring a sale of the company, possibly to Charter Communications.[13] However, on November 22, 2013, reports surfaced that Comcast expressed interest in acquiring Time Warner Cable. Both companies were said to be placing bids for the company.[14] Charter reiterated its interest in purchasing Time Warner Cable and increased its bid on January 14, 2014. On February 12, 2014, it was reported that Comcast had reached a deal to acquire TWC in an overall deal valued at $45.2 billion, pending regulatory approval.[15]
The proposed merger was met with prominent opposition from various groups, showing concerns that the sheer size of the combined company would reduce competition and would give Comcast an unprecedented level of control over the United States' internet and television industries, increased leverage in the distribution of NBCUniversal content, hamper over-the-top services, and lead to higher prices for its services.[16][17][18][19] In April 2015, it was reported that the U.S. Department of Justice was preparing to file an antitrust lawsuit against the companies in a bid to halt the merger, primarily because the merged company would have controlled 57 percent of the nation's broadband capacity. On April 24, 2015, Comcast officially announced that it had called off the merger.[20][21]
On May 25, 2015, Bloomberg News reported that Charter was "near" a deal to acquire TWC for $195 a share.[22] Charter had been involved in the Comcast/TWC merger, as the companies planned to divest around 4 million subscribers to Charter in order to reduce the combined company's market share to an acceptable level.[23] The next day, Charter officially announced its intent to acquire Time Warner Cable in a deal valued at $78.7 billion, and confirmed that it would also continue with its proposed, $10.1 billion acquisition of Bright House Networks. The deal was subject to regulatory approval, although due to the relatively smaller size of the companies and their media holdings, the deal was expected to face less resistance than the Comcast/TWC merger.[24]
The acquisition was completed on May 18, 2016. The Time Warner Cable brand was phased out in favor of Spectrum, the brand used by Charter to market its services.[25][5][26]
Residential services[edit]
As of second quarter 2009, there were 14.6 million basic cable subscribers, 8.8 million Digital cable subscribers, 8.7 million Road Runner residential subscribers, 2.5 million DVR subscribers,[27] and 4.5 million residential Digital Phone subscribers, which makes it the fifth-largest landline phone provider in the United States.[28]
Business services[edit]
As of 2013, Time Warner Cable's business division had the second largest business-facing enterprise by revenue (of cable providers who offer business services), with $1.7 billion in revenue as of the third quarter of 2013. Total revenue for 2012 was $1.9 billion.[29]
Cable Internet service[edit]
Main article: Spectrum Internet
Naming rights[edit]
Current[edit]
Arena[edit]
Spectrum Center, formerly Time Warner Cable Arena, is located in Charlotte, North Carolina, the home of the NBA's Charlotte Hornets. In April 2008, the then-Bobcats reached a naming rights deal with Time Warner Cable, the Charlotte area's major cable television provider; the arena was named for the cable provider in exchange for the release of the team's television rights, which had been on the TWC co-owned Carolinas Sports Entertainment Television for its first season, which failed to find much cable coverage in the Charlotte market outside of Time Warner systems and went dark after a year, and then News 14 Carolina which was limited to only the North Carolina side of the market, until the arena naming rights deal was made. The team moved to the new Fox Sports South sub-feed Fox Sports Carolinas and SportSouth (now Fox Sports Southeast) with the 2008-09 season, allowing coverage through both the Carolinas.[30] Shortly after being acquired by Charter, the arena was renamed to Spectrum Center.
Former[edit]
Fox Cities Stadium[edit]
Main article: Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium
On March 9, 2007, Time Warner Cable, which provides service to the northeastern Wisconsin area, signed a 10-year naming rights deal. The field is home of the Wisconsin Timber Rattlers, a local minor league baseball team of the Midwest League and affiliate of the Milwaukee Brewers, based in Grand Chute, a suburb of Appleton. The team and Time Warner Cable mutually agreed to end the rights deal after the 2013 season, and the venue is now known as Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium, named for a local neurology practice.
Acquisitions[edit]
Adelphia[edit]
On July 31, 2007, Time Warner Cable and Comcast completed a deal to purchase practically all of Adelphia's assets for $17 billion.[31] Time Warner Cable gained 3.3 million of Adelphia's subscribers, a 29 percent increase, while Comcast gained almost 1.7 million subscribers. Adelphia stockholders received 16% of Time Warner Cable. Time Warner Cable went public effective February 13, 2007, and the company began trading on the New York Stock Exchange on March 1, 2007.[32]
In addition to Adelphia's coverage being divided up, Time Warner Cable and Comcast also agreed to exchange some of their own subscribers in order to consolidate key regions. An example of this is the Los Angeles market, which was mostly covered by Comcast and Adelphia (and some areas of the region already served by TWC), is now under Time Warner Cable. Philadelphia had been split between Time Warner and Comcast, with the majority of cable subscribers belonging to Comcast. Time Warner subscribers in Philadelphia were swapped with Comcast in early 2007. Similarly, the Houston area, which was under Time Warner, was swapped to Comcast, while the Dallas metro area was changed to Time Warner (RR).[33] In the Twin Cities, Minneapolis was Time Warner and Saint Paul was Comcast. That whole market is now Comcast.
NaviSite[edit]
Time Warner Cable purchased NaviSite (NAVI), a company providing cloud and hosting services, on February 1, 2011 for $230 million, roughly equating to $5.50 per share.[34]
Insight Communications[edit]
On August 13, 2011, Time Warner Cable announced its purchase of Insight Communications for $3 billion acquiring Insight's 760,000 subscribers nationwide. The merger was completed February 29, 2012, and as of June 2013 all of Insight Communications was absorbed into Time Warner Cable.[35]
DukeNet Communications[edit]
On October 7, 2013, Time Warner Cable announced that it has agreed to acquire DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million. DukeNet provides data and high-capacity bandwidth services to wireless carrier, data center, government, and enterprise customers in the Southeast.[36]
Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)[edit]
Some of the regional cable system clusters operated by Time Warner Cable are owned by the Time Warner Entertainment – Advance/Newhouse Partnership (TWEAN). In 2002, Advance/Newhouse Communications, unhappy with some of the operating policies of Time Warner Cable in the AOL Time Warner era, forced a restructuring of the TWEAN partnership such that Advance/Newhouse would actively manage and operate a portion of the jointly owned cable systems equal to their percentage of equity. Under this arrangement, Advance/Newhouse enjoys the proceeds of their actively managed systems rather than simply a percentage of the partnership's total earnings. The majority of the affected systems are in the Tampa and Orlando markets under the Bright House Networks brand.
The value of this deal is that it allows Advance/Newhouse to more directly control their cable investments without having to completely unravel the TWEAN partnership, which does bring some benefits via Time Warner's development and purchasing clout.
The transactions proposed by Charter were approved, TWC and Bright House Networks have been absorbed into Charter.[24]
Venture with Sprint Nextel[edit]
In late 2005, TWC and several other cable companies formed a venture with Sprint Nextel. This joint venture enables TWC customers to receive a full suite of products, linking in-home and out-of-home entertainment, information, and communications services. All of this was included in the new "Triple Play on the Go", similar to the Triple Play[discuss] but an addition of new services through Sprint Nextel.
Controversies[edit]
Bandwidth metering[edit]
In Beaumont, Texas, during 2008, Time Warner Cable began testing tier-based metered data plans that effectively placed customers into a pricing hierarchy based on the amount of data that they used, [clarification needed].[37] In 2009, Time Warner Cable announced that additional cities including Rochester, New York will become additional test sites. In particular in Rochester groups have formed to stop TWC. Several groups including Stop TWC[38] and Stop The Cap[39] are currently working to oppose these efforts. On April 7, 2009, then US Congressman Eric Massa called on Time Warner to eliminate its broadband Internet cap.[40]
Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography[edit]
On March 16, 2010, Time Warner Cable's transmission of their Kids on Demand and Kids Pre-School on Demand channels on systems in eastern North Carolina was interrupted by programming from the adult pay television channel Playboy TV for approximately two hours between 6:15 a.m. and 8:15 a.m./EDT, in which a group of nude women talked and posed in a sexually suggestive manner.[41] This accidental display affected Time Warner's digital cable subscribers in four towns in the system's eastern North Carolina cluster, while other areas displayed a black screen. A Time Warner spokesperson said in a statement to Raleigh CBS affiliate WRAL, "It was a technical malfunction that caused the wrong previews to be shown on our kids' on-demand channels. Unfortunately it hit at the worst possible time on the worst possible channels."[42] A Time Warner executive said normal monitoring procedures did not take effect because the glitch affected only a few areas. Customers were told to pay the small fee, and that their next bill would be reduced. [43]
Cable clusters[edit]




Time Warner Cable ident used until 2010. Remained in use on its "Business Class" division.



West Coast cluster

California – Barstow, Desert Cities, Orange County, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego
Hawaii (operating as Oceanic Time Warner Cable)


Midwest cluster

Kansas – Kansas City, Overland Park, Olathe, Shawnee
Missouri – Kansas City, Independence, Lee's Summit
Nebraska
Ohio – Akron, Bowling Green/North Baltimore, Canton, Cincinnati, Cleveland, Columbus, Dayton, Findlay/Lima, and Youngstown
Kentucky – Lexington, Louisville, Northern Kentucky, Ashland
Pennsylvania – Erie County, Sharon, Franklin
Wisconsin – Green Bay and Milwaukee


Northeast cluster

Maine
New Hampshire – Berlin, Keene
Massachusetts – Athol, Pittsfield
Upstate New York


The Carolinas cluster

North Carolina – Charlotte, Raleigh, Greensboro, and Wilmington
South Carolina – Columbia, Sumter, Florence, Summerville, Hilton Head and Myrtle Beach.


New York cluster

New Jersey – Bergen County, Hudson County
New York – New York City (Manhattan, Queens, Staten Island, most of western Brooklyn); Mount Vernon (Westchester County, rest of county is Cablevision)


Texas cluster

Texas – Arlington, Austin, Beaumont/Port Arthur, Corpus Christi, Dallas, El Paso, Harlingen, Killeen/Temple, Laredo, Rio Grande Valley, San Antonio, Waco, and Wichita Falls

coincidentally, the Irving-Grapevine-Coppell-Lewisville cluster had been under Time Warner Cable's control upon acquisition of Paragon Cable. This was prior to AT&T Broadband's full absorption of that cluster.




Not in a cluster (National)

Alabama – Dothan, Enterprise
Arizona – Yuma
California – El Centro
Colorado – Gunnison, Telluride
Idaho – Coeur d'Alene, Moscow
Indiana – Terre Haute
Virginia
Washington – Pullman
West Virginia – Clarksburg



Divisions[edit]
Time Warner Cable's divisions, from official website:
West Region[edit]




Former logo for "Oceanic Time Warner Cable" division



PAC West Region

Oceanic Time Warner Cable (Hawaii)
Time Warner Cable Desert Cities
Time Warner Cable San Diego
Time Warner Cable Southern California (SoCal)


Midwest Region

Time Warner Cable Kansas City
Time Warner Cable Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Northeast Ohio & Western Pennsylvania (Akron, Canton, Cleveland & Youngstown; Erie County & Sharon, PA)
Time Warner Cable Mid-Ohio (Columbus)
Time Warner Cable Southwest Ohio (Dayton; Cincinnati; Lexington, KY; Louisville, KY; Terre Haute, IN; Clarksburg, WV)
Time Warner Cable Wisconsin (Milwaukee & Green Bay)


Texas Region
Time Warner Cable National (non-clustered systems)

East Region[edit]




Time Warner Cable Spectrum.



Northeast Region

Time Warner Cable Albany
Time Warner Cable Buffalo
Time Warner Cable Rochester
Time Warner Cable Central New York / Syracuse
Time Warner Cable New England
Time Warner Cable New York City


Carolinas Region

Time Warner Cable Charlotte
Time Warner Cable Greensboro
Time Warner Cable Eastern Carolina
Time Warner Cable Raleigh
Time Warner Cable South Carolina (Columbia)
Time Warner Cable Fayetteville/Sandhills



Former divisions[edit]
Sold to Comcast

Time Warner Cable Houma
Time Warner Cable Houston
Time Warner Cable Lake City/Live Oak
Time Warner Cable Mid-South (Memphis, TN, AR, and MS)
Time Warner Cable Minnesota
Time Warner Cable Shreveport
Time Warner Cable St. Augustine/Palatka
Time Warner Cable Cape Coral/Naples

Divisions that became Bright House Networks

Time Warner Cable Central Florida[44]
Time Warner Cable Tampa Bay

Rankings[edit]
The American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI) ranked Time Warner Cable as one of the least liked companies in terms of customer satisfaction in 2011,[45] 2012,[46] 2013,[7][47] and 2014.[48]
See also[edit]

List of United States telephone companies
Spectrum Sports

References[edit]


^ "Top 25 Multichannel Video Service Customers (2012)". National Cable & Telecommunications Association. Retrieved 2013-01-02. 
^ "Investor Relations Contact Us." Time Warner Cable. Retrieved on March 6, 2010.
^ "Locations". Time Warner Cable. Archived from the original on July 16, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2012. 
^ Smith, Gerry (June 25, 2015). "Charter Promises Faster, Cheaper Internet to Win Merger Approval". Bloomberg. 
^ a b "So Long Time Warner Cable: Charter to Retire Much-Maligned Brand". Bloomberg. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Glenn Britt timeline" (PDF). 
^ a b Henry, David; Sherman, Alex (June 11, 2014). "Glenn Britt, Who Raised Time Warner Cable Shares, Dies at 65". Bloomberg. Retrieved September 6, 2014. 
^ "Time Warner Cable Spinoff to Finish Next Month". New York Times. February 27, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner's $9 Billion Cable Spinoff". CBS News. Associated Press. May 21, 2008. Retrieved May 23, 2008. 
^ "Time Warner Sets Final Distribution Ratio For Cable Spinoff". Dow Jones (via CNN Money). March 20, 2009. Retrieved March 27, 2009. [dead link]
^ Lasar, Matthew (June 24, 2009). "Is Comcast and TimeWarner's "TV Everywhere" TV for everyone?". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ Cheng, Jacqui (December 15, 2009). "Comcast expands online video to all cable+Internet customers". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ "Analyst: Charter, Time Warner Cable Merger Looks Probable". Fox Business.com. September 11, 2013. Retrieved September 11, 2013. 
^ Flint, Joe; James, Meg (November 22, 2013). "Charter Communications and Comcast may battle for Time Warner Cable". New York Times. Retrieved November 22, 2013. 
^ Baker, Liana B. (February 13, 2014). "CORRECTED-UPDATE 7-Comcast takeover of Time Warner Cable to reshape U.S. pay TV". Reuters. Retrieved 13 February 2014. 
^ "Netflix Says It Opposes Comcast’s Merger Bid". The New York Times. 21 Apr 2014. Retrieved 25 Apr 2014. 
^ "More Than 50 Public Interest Groups Speak Out Against the Comcast-Time Warner Cable Merger". Freepress.net. 8 Apr 2014. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Julian Hattem (24 Mar 2014). "Writers Guild protests Comcast-Time Warner deal". The Hill. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Ira Teinowitz (9 Apr 2014). "Consumer Group Slams Comcast, Time-Warner Deal at New Senate Hearing (Updated)". The Wrap. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ "Comcast/TWC merger may be blocked by Justice Department". Ars Technica. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Comcast / Time Warner Cable / Charter Transactions Terminated – Comcast Press Statement". Comcast. Retrieved 24 April 2015. 
^ Sherman, Alex (25 May 2015). "Charter Near Deal for Time Warner Cable at $195 a Share". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 25 May 2015. 
^ McGrath, Maggie (28 April 2014). "Comcast Strikes Deal With Charter To Divest Nearly 4 Million Subscribers". Forbes. Retrieved 9 June 2014. 
^ a b Steel, Emily (May 26, 2015). "Charter Communications Agrees to Acquire Time Warner Cable". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Charter completes purchase of Time Warner Cable, Bright House". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Charter introduces Spectrum brand in Southern California". Los Angeles Times. September 20, 2016. Retrieved September 21, 2016. 
^ "About Us - Time Warner Cable's Company History and News". 
^ Leichtman Research Group, "Research Notes," First Quarter 2012, pg. 6, Time Warner (#5) with 4,544,000 residential phone lines.
^ "Heavy Reading: Cable Biz Sales to Hit $8.5B | Light Reading". 
^ "Deals widen Bobcats' TV reach". Charlotte.com. April 9, 2008. Retrieved April 16, 2008. 
^ "CNNMoney.com: Time Warner to save on programming costs after Adelphia Deal – Jul, 31. 2006". CNN. July 31, 2006. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Press Release: Time Warner Cable Becomes a Public Company". Timewarner.com. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ Ehling, Jeff (August 2, 2006). "Time-Warner Cable leaving Houston". KTRK-TV. American Broadcasting Company. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Cable buys NaviSite as hosting acquisitions pick up". zdnet.com. February 1, 2011. Retrieved August 21, 2011. 
^ "Lexington, KY local and state news by the Lexington Herald-Leader – Kentucky.com". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Time Warner Cable to acquire Regional Fiber Optic Network Company DukeNet Communications". Retrieved 8 October 2013. 
^ Lawson, Stephen (January 18, 2008). "Time Warner to Try Tiered Cable Pricing". IDG News Service. PC World. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ "Stop TWC – More Info Coming Soon! Please Check Back!". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Stop the Cap!". Stop the Cap!. Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ Massa, Eric. "Congressman Eric Massa calls on Time Warner to eliminate Broadband Internet Cap". Archived from the original on April 9, 2009. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ Pearson, Erica (March 17, 2010). "Time Warner apologizes for accidentally showing Playboy previews on kiddie channels in N.C". Daily News. New York. 
^ Davis, Stacy (2010-03-16). "Time Warner apologizes for Playboy-kids channel glitch". WRAL.com. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ [1] Archived February 3, 2013, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Time Warner Cable changes name to Bright House". Orlando Business Journal. American City Business Journals. March 7, 2003. 
^ Lubin, Gus; Vivian Giang (2011-06-29). "The 19 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ Spector, Dina; Gus Lubin; Vivian Giang (2012-06-22). "The 15 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ "Benchmarks by Companies: All Companies". American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI). 
^ Fottrell, Quentin (December 31, 2014). "The most unpopular company in America is …". MarketWatch. Retrieved January 25, 2015. 








v
t
e


Charter Communications



Leadership



Thomas M. Rutledge (CEO)





Internet properties



Spectrum Internet





Cable
television
channels




News channels



Austin
Buffalo
Capital Region
Central NY
Florida

Bay News 9
News 13
InfoMás


New York City

NY1
NY1 Noticias
NY1 Rail and Road


North Carolina
Rochester





Sports channels



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet/Deportes LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





Local / Regional



Charter TV3 (Worcester)
Spectrum Community

Maine
Southern California


Spectrum OC16 (Hawaii)













Links to related articles











v
t
e


Liberty Interactive



Liberty Interactive Group



Bodybuilding.com (83%)
BuySeasons
CommerceHub (99%)
Evite
Gifts.com
HSN (34%)
Provide Commerce (ProFlowers)
QVC

Zulily


Right Start





Liberty Ventures Group



Expedia, Inc. (18%)
Interval International (30%)
Tree.com (25%)
TripAdvisor (26%)












v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other specialty television providers in the United States



Cable MVPD



Adams Cable
Allegiance Communications
Altice USA

Optimum
Suddenlink Communications


Armstrong
Atlantic Broadband
Blue Ridge Communications
Blue Stream
Broadstripe
Buckeye Broadband
Cable One
Charter Spectrum
Comcast Xfinity
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


Cox Communications
Docomo Pacific
Emery Telcom
Full Channel
GCI
Hargray
Layer3 TV
Mediacom
Midco
Northland Communications
OneLink Communications
Satview Broadband
Service Electric
SRT Communications
TDS Telecom
TPG

Grande Communications
RCN Corporation
Wave Broadband


TruVista Communications
WOW!





Satellite MVPD



Claro
Dish Network
DirecTV
Glorystar
Headend in the Sky
Home2US





Fiber MVPD / IPTV



AT&T U-verse
CenturyLink Prism TV
Cincinnati Bell FiOptics
Claro
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


EPB
Frontier FiOS
Google Fiber
GTA Teleguam
Hawaiian Telcom
Layer3 TV
Midco
NEP Datastream TV
TDS Telecom
Verizon FiOS
Windstream Kinetic





Virtual MVPD



DirecTV Now
FuboTV
Hulu with Live TV
PlayStation Vue
Skitter TV
Sling TV
YouTube TV





Over-the-top



Amazon Video
Anime Network
Apple TV (iTunes Store)
CBS All Access
Crackle
Crunchyroll
CW Seed
CuriosityStream
DramaFever
Fandor
Feeln
FunimationNow
go90
HBO Now
History Vault
Hulu
iON (IPTV)
Lifetime Movie Club
Netflix
Noggin
Pluto TV
Roku
Seeso
Showtime
StarzPlay
Tribeca Shortlist
Tubi TV
Univision NOW
Yupptv





Defunct cable



Adelphia Communications Corporation
Alameda Power and Telecom1
Astound Broadband
AT&T Broadband

MediaOne / Continental Cablevision
Tele-Communications Inc.


Baja Broadband

US Cable


Bresnan Communications
Bright House Networks
Cablevision
Champion Broadband
Cobridge Communications
Community Home Entertainment
Graceba Total Communications
Insight Communications
Jones Intercable
King Videocable
Knology
Marcus Cable
NPG Cable
Paragon Cable
Rapid Communications
TelePrompTer / Group W Cable
Time Warner Cable
UA-Columbia Cablevision
Windjammer Communications

1 – Still in operation, but no longer offers cable or Internet as part of its services




Defunct satellite



AlphaStar
GlobeCast World TV
PrimeStar
United States Satellite Broadcasting
Voom HD Networks





Defunct IPTV



Sky Angel
Virtual Digital Cable





Defunct terrestrial



Aereo
USDTV
MovieBeam





See also



Radio spectrum pollution












v
t
e


Additional resources on North American television



North America



List of local television stations in North America
DTV transition
North American TV mini-template





Canada



Canadian networks
List of Canadian television networks
List of Canadian television channels
List of Canadian specialty channels
Local Canadian TV stations
List of United States stations available in Canada
2001 Vancouver TV realignment
2007 Canada broadcast TV realignment





Mexico



Mexican networks
Local Mexican TV stations





United States



American networks
List of American cable and satellite networks
List of American over-the-air networks
Local American TV stations (W)
Local American TV stations (K)
Spanish-language TV networks
1994 United States broadcast TV realignment
2006 United States broadcast TV realignment
List of Canadian television stations available in the United States
Insular Areas TV











Africa, Asia, and Oceania
Americas
Europe












v
t
e


Sports television in the United States



Broadcast
divisions





English




American Sports Network
CBS Sports
ESPN on ABC
Fox Sports
NBC Sports
Turner Sports






Spanish




Azteca
Telemundo Deportes (Telemundo/Universo)
Univision Deportes








National
channels





English




beIN Sports
CBS Sports Network
ESPN

ESPN2


FS1

FS2


NBCSN
Olympic Channel






Spanish




beIN Sports en Español
ESPN Deportes
Fox Deportes
Univision Deportes Network








Specialty
channels





College




Big Ten Network
ESPNU
Fox College Sports
Longhorn Network
Pac-12 Network
SEC Network






Single sport




Cricket TicketO
ESPN College Extra
ESPN Goal Line/Buzzer BeaterP
Fox Soccer PlusP
GOL TV
Golf Channel
In DemandP
MAVTV
MLB Network
MLB Extra InningsO
MLB Strike ZoneP
MLS Direct KickO
NBA League PassO
NBA TV
NFL Network
NFL RedZoneP
NFL Sunday TicketO
NHL Network
NHL Center IceO
Tennis Channel
TVG

TVG2


Willow






Outdoors




Frost Great Outdoors
Outdoor Channel
Pursuit Channel
Sportsman Channel
World Fishing Network






Other




Eleven Sports Network
ESPN Classic
ESPNews
ESPN PPVP
Ride TV








Syndicators



ACC Network (Raycom Sports)
ESPN Events





Broadband



Fox Sports Go
MLB.tv
UFC Fight Pass
WatchESPN (ESPN3)
WWE Network
WWNLive





Video on demand



The Ski Channel
Surf Channel













v
t
e


Regional sports television networks in the United States



AT&T SportsNet



Northwest
Pittsburgh
Rocky Mountain
Southwest
Utah





Fox Sports Networks



Arizona
Detroit
Florida / Sun
Midwest

Indiana
Kansas City


North
Ohio / SportsTime Ohio
Southeast / South

Carolinas
Tennessee


Southwest

Oklahoma
New Orleans


West / Prime Ticket

San Diego


Wisconsin
YES Network





NBC Sports Regional Networks
(Comcast)



Bay Area
California
Chicago
Mid-Atlantic
New England
Northwest

Oregon Sports Network


Philadelphia





Spectrum Sports
(Charter)



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





YurView (Cox)



Arizona
California
Kansas
Las Vegas
Louisiana
New England
Oklahoma
Virginia





Independents



Altitude Sports
Buckeye Cable Sports
BYUtv Sports
Cox Sports TV
FiOS1
Longhorn Network
Mid-Atlantic Sports
Midco Sports
MSG Network

Plus
Western NY


NESN
SportsNet NY
SWX Right Now


















v
t
e


Defunct television sports networks in the United States



National



America One
American Sports Classics
Back9Network
Baseball Network
Big 12 Network
CNN SI
ESPN 3D
Football Network
Fox Soccer
Lorimar Sports Network
Mizlou
NASCAR Hot Pass
NewSport
One World Sports
ONTV
SEC TV
Speed
SportsChannel America
Sports Network
Universal Sports Network





Regional



4SD
Carolinas SE
Cox Sports
Empire
Hawkvision
MountainWest
PASS Sports
Prime
PRISM
Royals Sports
SportsChannel LA
Sportsvision
Sports Time
Victory





Out-of-market



ESPN Full Court
ESPN GamePlan
Mega March Madness











O. Out-of-market sports packages P. Premium channel













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Time_Warner_Cable&oldid=792249246"					
Categories: Time Warner CableCable television companies of the United StatesCompanies based in Fairfield County, ConnecticutEntertainment companies established in 1973Media companies established in 1973Media companies disestablished in 2016Media companies of the United States1973 establishments in the United States2016 disestablishments in the United StatesCompanies formerly listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFormer Time Warner subsidiariesVoIP companies of the United States2016 acquisitionsCorporate spin-offsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2010Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from June 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaNederlands日本語Simple EnglishSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 12:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft














Digital Adapters | Spectrum
























































Skip To Content

















































































Digital Adapters





















                    Ask TWC - Virtual Assistant
                







 Go



















Find the answers to questions our customers ask most often, such as:








Can I purchase my own internet modem?








How do I get a new remote control?








How do I make a payment?








What if I have problems logging in?








Where can I replace or return my TWC Internet hardware?
























What is a Digital Adapter?





A Digital Adapter is a small converter that allows viewing of digital TV services on your television. An adapter is about the size of a deck of cards.
If you connect your TV set directly from the wall with a cable wire, you will need equipment, such as a Digital Adapter, for every TV in your home.
Digital Adapters are no longer available.  Customers who have them can contact us with questions.





 






Details for Business Class customers






Para información en español





 
























 






Installing, Activating & Troubleshooting Your Digital Adapter

















Watch a video about how to install your Digital Adapter








 

















Watch a video about the digital conversion








 









 

Setup Guides & Remote Control Info





Adobe Reader required. Download here.
 








Cisco 271








Cisco 271 en Español













Cisco 170








Cisco 170 en Español













ARRIS/Motorola or Technicolor (English and Español)













 

Other Resources
Instructions: How to install, activate and troubleshoot your Digital Adapter
 








FAQs about digital conversion







FAQs about TV service encryption







(NYC, LA and Austin only)














 
Note: In addition to a Set-Top Box or a Digital Adapter, an HDTV or HD monitor is required to view high-definition TV programming.





 

















Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us





















 
*Digital Adapter is a device that provides digital-quality signals. It does not provide access to our on-screen channel guide, premium channels (such as HBO®, Showtime®, Starz®, etc.), Pay-Per-View or On Demand programming as well as video features such as Start Over® or Caller ID on TV. If you are interested in these digital services, you will need to lease a Digital Set-Top Box. Some services are not available to CableCARD™ customers or customers with Digital Adapters. As a condition of service, you may be required to have equipment for every TV in your home. Not all equipment supports all services. All services may not be available in all areas. Subject to change without notice.





























TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC -  OhioCorporates – Company Profiles of Ohio


























Home















FIND 


Search for company name, business locations, officers, contacts ..　　　





 
Home » T » TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC












QR Code Of This Company





This is a QR Code for TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC. If you have a QR Code scanning app, you can simply scan this image to have this business's information displayed on your phone.




Related Companies


TERAB EXPRESS TRANSPORTATION INC
THE CALLANDER CACTUS COMPANY
THE WILLIAM-STERLING LIMITED PARTNERSHIP
TRI-STATE AUGER MINING, INC.
THE CLEVELAND AUTOMATIC WINDOW COMPANY
TORI SACHA CORDIANO, PH.D., LLC
TARASTAR LIMITED
THE C. C. SNYDER COMPANY
TREESCAPES OF BUCYRUS LTD.
THE GALLIA MASONIC COMPANY
TKL ENTERPRISES,  INC.
THE COLUMBUS HAY PRESS AND STORAGE COMPANY
THE CITIZENS REALTY AND INVESTMENT COMPANY
THE MARYHAVEN FOUNDATION
THE FOUR COUNTY FAIR COMPANY
THE MILL YOUTH STOP
TERRACE PARK AUTO SERVICE, LLC
TWIN LANTERNS, INC.
THE COPY SHOP, INCORPORATED
TPM SERVICES, LLC
THE CONCORD INSURANCE AGENCY, LLC
TIM KURGUZ ENTERPRISES INC.
THE PERZ GROUP LLC
THE DOMESTIC AND FOREIGN MISSIONARY SOCIETY OF THE PROTESTANT EPISCOPAL CHURCH IN THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA







TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC










This profile contains information from public web pages.

Company Profile



Company Name
TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC


Entity Number
1402423


Filing Type
FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY


Status
Active


Filing Date
07/29/2003


Expiry Date
n/a


Location
n/a


County
n/a


State
DELAWARE


Agent
CT CORPORATION SYSTEM1300 EAST NINTH STREET CLEVELAND,OH 44114Effective Date: 07/29/2003


Incorporator
n/a



Company Overview
				
TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC is a company incorporated in Ohio and its Entity Number is 1402423. TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC was filed on 07/29/2003. The company's status is listed as Active.	










Contact Information



Company Name
TIME WARNER CABLE INFORMATION SERVICES (OHIO), LLC


Telephone
n/a


Address
n/a


Email
n/a



Data Disclaimer
				
The information provided on ohiocorporates.com is collected from a variety of public sources. ohiocorporates.com website aim to provide the most comprehensive data , however this is dependant on the level of information filed in the public domain.
Data could have changed since the last update. ohiocorporates.com website advise our visitors to express caution if in doubt, and to seek professional advice before commencing legal action, based on any information contained herein.
When you visit ohiocorporates.com website, we send one or more cookies to your computer or other device that uniquely identifies your browser. We uses cookies in its advertising services to help advertisers and publishers serve and manage ads across the web. We may set one or more cookies in your browser when you visit a website, including We sites that use our advertising cookies, and view or click on an ad supported by our advertising services.

 




Company Index:  
0-9 
A 
B 
C 
D 
E 
F 
G 
H 
I 
J 
K 
L 
M 
N 
O 
P 
Q 
R 
S 
T 
U 
V 
W 
X 
Y 
Z 

Home  |  
About Us  |  
Privacy Policy  |  
Contact Us



© 2013 OhioCorporates - Company Profiles of Ohio





















Tariffs for utility and telecommunications companies




PUCO































 



 

	Files

 
 


Tariffs for utility and telecommunications companies
Some files may require additional software for viewing. Download the Adobe Acrobat Reader for files ending in "pdf". 


		Directory:  
	

 Tariffs for utility and telecommunications companies




 Competitive local exchange





 Time Warner Cable Information Services Ohio LLC dba Time Warner Cable 
				


 
3 Files:




PUCO 2 Access Services.pdf 
390 kb

				
					 
				





Telecommunications Retail Service Offering Form.pdf 
47 kb

				
					 
				





Web link 
 

				
					 
				

Viewing  PDF files requires the Adobe Acrobat Reader.



 










Find Spectrum Stores | Spectrum Support
























































Skip To Content












































































TWC Stores

























Enter your full address







We’re sorry, but we do not have a store near that location.
To find a store or payment partner near you, try these tips:

- Change the ZIP Code
- Adjust the distance
- Alter your "Location Types" filter

Error: Please select at least one filter

Search by street address for more accurate results.







Within:

25 miles
50 miles
75 miles


























Location Types



 Full Service 



 Payment Partners 



 Sales Only Kiosk 








Clear



GO

























List
Map










Currently showing ({resultCount}) results near {formattedAddress}

















Email





Send to a Friend



Your Email Address





Send To





Add Comments (optional)












Send


Cancel


























 Full Service
                                

 Payment Partners
                                

 Sales Only Kiosk
                                

 New Store
                                








 Cash
                                

 Check
                                

 Credit Card
                                









NOTE: Full-service locations accept cash, check, credit card payments and provide equipment demos, exchanges, returns and self-installation kits. Payment Partners are third-party locations that only accept payments.


















{displayName}

                        {location.addressLine1}
                        {location.addressLine2}
                        
                        {location.city}, {location.state} {location.zip}
                    

Hours

                    {hours}
                    
Directions | Distance: {@math key=distance method="round"/} mi
                




                    {#listItems.paymentTypeList}
                        
                    {/listItems.paymentTypeList}
                    {#listItems.servicesList}
                        
                    {/listItems.servicesList}

                    {#listItems.locationTypeList}
                        
                    {/listItems.locationTypeList}

                    
Location Options
                    {#listItems.servicesList}
                        {niceName}
                    {/listItems.servicesList}
                








{displayName}

    {location.addressLine1}
    {location.addressLine2}
    
    {location.city}, {location.state} {location.zip}


Hours

{hours}

Directions | Distance: {@math key=distance method="round"/} mi







Verify your TWC Service ZIP Code to help us serve you better.







You are visiting us from an area we don’t currently service. Please enter your TWC Service ZIP Code.










GO







We could not determine your locationOur services may not be available in your area.

Make sure you entered your zip code correctly. If you entered your zip code correctly, visit cablemovers.com to contact the cable company serving your area.


Invalid Zip code format.Please enter valid Zip Code.


Cookies are not enabledYou do not have cookies enabled.In order for us to serve you better, please enable cookies.





























Community Forums

















Go to support overview

















Find a location near you

















Contact us













































Time Warner Cable - Wikipedia






















 






Time Warner Cable

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Time Warner Cable Inc.


Time Warner Cable's final logo used until the acquisition with Charter Communications.




Former type

Subsidiary


Industry
Telecommunications
Mass media


Fate
Acquired by Charter Communications


Successor
Spectrum


Founded
1973; 44 years ago (1973)


Founder
Time Warner
(merger of Time Inc. & Warner Communications)


Defunct
2016; 1 year ago (2016)


Headquarters
Time Warner Center, New York City, New York, United States



Area served

United States



Key people

Robert D. Marcus
(Chairman & CEO)


Parent
Warner Communications (1973–1990)
Time Warner (1990-2009) Charter Communications (2016-Present)


Subsidiaries
Time Warner Cable Enterprises LLC






Time Warner Center, formerly the headquarters of the company in New York City. It was shared by its namesake, but now unrelated company, Time Warner.






Time Warner Cable building entrance in Morrisville, North Carolina


Time Warner Cable (TWC) was an American cable television company. Prior to its purchase by Charter Communications in 2016, it was ranked the second largest cable company in the United States by revenue behind only Comcast, operating in 29 states.[1] Its corporate headquarters were located in the Time Warner Center in Midtown Manhattan, New York City,[2] with other corporate offices in Stamford, Connecticut; Charlotte, North Carolina; and Herndon, Virginia.[3]
It was controlled by Warner Communications, then by Time Warner (the film and television production company and cable channel operator). That company spun off the cable operations in March 2009 as part of a larger restructuring. From 2009 to 2016, Time Warner Cable was an entirely independent company, continuing to use the Time Warner name under license from its former parent (including the "Road Runner" name for its Internet service, now Spectrum Internet).
In 2014, the company was the subject of a proposed purchase by Comcast Corporation, valued at $45.2 billion; however, following opposition to the deal by various groups, along with plans by the U.S. government to try to block the merger, Comcast called off the deal in April 2015. On May 26, 2015, Charter Communications announced that it would acquire Time Warner Cable for $78.7 billion, along with Bright House Networks in a separate $10.1 billion deal, pending regulatory approval.[4]
The purchase was completed on May 18, 2016; Charter had continued to do business as Time Warner Cable in its former markets, but has now re-branded these operations under the Spectrum brand in most markets.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sale


2 Residential services
3 Business services
4 Cable Internet service
5 Naming rights

5.1 Current

5.1.1 Arena


5.2 Former

5.2.1 Fox Cities Stadium




6 Acquisitions

6.1 Adelphia
6.2 NaviSite
6.3 Insight Communications
6.4 DukeNet Communications


7 Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)
8 Venture with Sprint Nextel
9 Controversies

9.1 Bandwidth metering
9.2 Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography


10 Cable clusters
11 Divisions

11.1 West Region
11.2 East Region
11.3 Former divisions


12 Rankings
13 See also
14 References



History[edit]
Time Warner Cable was formed in 1992 by the merger of Time Inc.'s cable television company, American Television and Communications Corp. (service areas that had belonged to that company went under the Time Warner Communications name; since the 1990s, areas that had used that name have either been renamed to Time Warner Cable, Bright House Networks, or have been given to other cable providers), and Warner Cable, a division of Warner Communications, as a result of a merger to form Time Warner; for the two years after the merger, the companies operated separately but under the umbrella name "Time Warner Cable Group" (primarily due to 18% of ATC having been publicly owned at the time); they merged into one entity in 1992. It also includes the remnants of the defunct QUBE interactive TV service. In 1995, the company launched the Southern Tier On-Line Community, a cable modem service later known as Road Runner High Speed Online. That year, talks began that would later result in Warner's acquisition of Paragon Cable. Glenn Britt (1949–2014)[6][7] was the CEO from 2001 until December 2013.
Time Warner retained Time Warner Cable as a subsidiary until March 2009, when it was spun out as an independent company.[8] Prior to the spin-out, Time Warner had held an 84% stake in Time Warner Cable.[9] Non-Time Warner shareholders received 0.083670 shares for each share already owned. This move made Time Warner Cable the largest cable operator in the United States owned solely by a single class of shareholders (without supervoting stock).[10]
Time Warner Cable launched DVR service in the Houston area in 2004. (TWC's Houston-area cable systems are now owned by Comcast.) When first launched, it used Scientific-Atlanta set-top boxes with DVR.
In June 2009, Time Warner Cable unveiled a concept known as "TV Everywhere"—a means of allowing multi-platform access to live and on-demand content to content from television channels that is tied to a user's television subscription.[11][12]
Sale[edit]
Main article: Attempted purchase of Time Warner Cable by Comcast
It was first reported in October 2013 that Time Warner Cable was exploring a sale of the company, possibly to Charter Communications.[13] However, on November 22, 2013, reports surfaced that Comcast expressed interest in acquiring Time Warner Cable. Both companies were said to be placing bids for the company.[14] Charter reiterated its interest in purchasing Time Warner Cable and increased its bid on January 14, 2014. On February 12, 2014, it was reported that Comcast had reached a deal to acquire TWC in an overall deal valued at $45.2 billion, pending regulatory approval.[15]
The proposed merger was met with prominent opposition from various groups, showing concerns that the sheer size of the combined company would reduce competition and would give Comcast an unprecedented level of control over the United States' internet and television industries, increased leverage in the distribution of NBCUniversal content, hamper over-the-top services, and lead to higher prices for its services.[16][17][18][19] In April 2015, it was reported that the U.S. Department of Justice was preparing to file an antitrust lawsuit against the companies in a bid to halt the merger, primarily because the merged company would have controlled 57 percent of the nation's broadband capacity. On April 24, 2015, Comcast officially announced that it had called off the merger.[20][21]
On May 25, 2015, Bloomberg News reported that Charter was "near" a deal to acquire TWC for $195 a share.[22] Charter had been involved in the Comcast/TWC merger, as the companies planned to divest around 4 million subscribers to Charter in order to reduce the combined company's market share to an acceptable level.[23] The next day, Charter officially announced its intent to acquire Time Warner Cable in a deal valued at $78.7 billion, and confirmed that it would also continue with its proposed, $10.1 billion acquisition of Bright House Networks. The deal was subject to regulatory approval, although due to the relatively smaller size of the companies and their media holdings, the deal was expected to face less resistance than the Comcast/TWC merger.[24]
The acquisition was completed on May 18, 2016. The Time Warner Cable brand was phased out in favor of Spectrum, the brand used by Charter to market its services.[25][5][26]
Residential services[edit]
As of second quarter 2009, there were 14.6 million basic cable subscribers, 8.8 million Digital cable subscribers, 8.7 million Road Runner residential subscribers, 2.5 million DVR subscribers,[27] and 4.5 million residential Digital Phone subscribers, which makes it the fifth-largest landline phone provider in the United States.[28]
Business services[edit]
As of 2013, Time Warner Cable's business division had the second largest business-facing enterprise by revenue (of cable providers who offer business services), with $1.7 billion in revenue as of the third quarter of 2013. Total revenue for 2012 was $1.9 billion.[29]
Cable Internet service[edit]
Main article: Spectrum Internet
Naming rights[edit]
Current[edit]
Arena[edit]
Spectrum Center, formerly Time Warner Cable Arena, is located in Charlotte, North Carolina, the home of the NBA's Charlotte Hornets. In April 2008, the then-Bobcats reached a naming rights deal with Time Warner Cable, the Charlotte area's major cable television provider; the arena was named for the cable provider in exchange for the release of the team's television rights, which had been on the TWC co-owned Carolinas Sports Entertainment Television for its first season, which failed to find much cable coverage in the Charlotte market outside of Time Warner systems and went dark after a year, and then News 14 Carolina which was limited to only the North Carolina side of the market, until the arena naming rights deal was made. The team moved to the new Fox Sports South sub-feed Fox Sports Carolinas and SportSouth (now Fox Sports Southeast) with the 2008-09 season, allowing coverage through both the Carolinas.[30] Shortly after being acquired by Charter, the arena was renamed to Spectrum Center.
Former[edit]
Fox Cities Stadium[edit]
Main article: Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium
On March 9, 2007, Time Warner Cable, which provides service to the northeastern Wisconsin area, signed a 10-year naming rights deal. The field is home of the Wisconsin Timber Rattlers, a local minor league baseball team of the Midwest League and affiliate of the Milwaukee Brewers, based in Grand Chute, a suburb of Appleton. The team and Time Warner Cable mutually agreed to end the rights deal after the 2013 season, and the venue is now known as Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium, named for a local neurology practice.
Acquisitions[edit]
Adelphia[edit]
On July 31, 2007, Time Warner Cable and Comcast completed a deal to purchase practically all of Adelphia's assets for $17 billion.[31] Time Warner Cable gained 3.3 million of Adelphia's subscribers, a 29 percent increase, while Comcast gained almost 1.7 million subscribers. Adelphia stockholders received 16% of Time Warner Cable. Time Warner Cable went public effective February 13, 2007, and the company began trading on the New York Stock Exchange on March 1, 2007.[32]
In addition to Adelphia's coverage being divided up, Time Warner Cable and Comcast also agreed to exchange some of their own subscribers in order to consolidate key regions. An example of this is the Los Angeles market, which was mostly covered by Comcast and Adelphia (and some areas of the region already served by TWC), is now under Time Warner Cable. Philadelphia had been split between Time Warner and Comcast, with the majority of cable subscribers belonging to Comcast. Time Warner subscribers in Philadelphia were swapped with Comcast in early 2007. Similarly, the Houston area, which was under Time Warner, was swapped to Comcast, while the Dallas metro area was changed to Time Warner (RR).[33] In the Twin Cities, Minneapolis was Time Warner and Saint Paul was Comcast. That whole market is now Comcast.
NaviSite[edit]
Time Warner Cable purchased NaviSite (NAVI), a company providing cloud and hosting services, on February 1, 2011 for $230 million, roughly equating to $5.50 per share.[34]
Insight Communications[edit]
On August 13, 2011, Time Warner Cable announced its purchase of Insight Communications for $3 billion acquiring Insight's 760,000 subscribers nationwide. The merger was completed February 29, 2012, and as of June 2013 all of Insight Communications was absorbed into Time Warner Cable.[35]
DukeNet Communications[edit]
On October 7, 2013, Time Warner Cable announced that it has agreed to acquire DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million. DukeNet provides data and high-capacity bandwidth services to wireless carrier, data center, government, and enterprise customers in the Southeast.[36]
Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)[edit]
Some of the regional cable system clusters operated by Time Warner Cable are owned by the Time Warner Entertainment – Advance/Newhouse Partnership (TWEAN). In 2002, Advance/Newhouse Communications, unhappy with some of the operating policies of Time Warner Cable in the AOL Time Warner era, forced a restructuring of the TWEAN partnership such that Advance/Newhouse would actively manage and operate a portion of the jointly owned cable systems equal to their percentage of equity. Under this arrangement, Advance/Newhouse enjoys the proceeds of their actively managed systems rather than simply a percentage of the partnership's total earnings. The majority of the affected systems are in the Tampa and Orlando markets under the Bright House Networks brand.
The value of this deal is that it allows Advance/Newhouse to more directly control their cable investments without having to completely unravel the TWEAN partnership, which does bring some benefits via Time Warner's development and purchasing clout.
The transactions proposed by Charter were approved, TWC and Bright House Networks have been absorbed into Charter.[24]
Venture with Sprint Nextel[edit]
In late 2005, TWC and several other cable companies formed a venture with Sprint Nextel. This joint venture enables TWC customers to receive a full suite of products, linking in-home and out-of-home entertainment, information, and communications services. All of this was included in the new "Triple Play on the Go", similar to the Triple Play[discuss] but an addition of new services through Sprint Nextel.
Controversies[edit]
Bandwidth metering[edit]
In Beaumont, Texas, during 2008, Time Warner Cable began testing tier-based metered data plans that effectively placed customers into a pricing hierarchy based on the amount of data that they used, [clarification needed].[37] In 2009, Time Warner Cable announced that additional cities including Rochester, New York will become additional test sites. In particular in Rochester groups have formed to stop TWC. Several groups including Stop TWC[38] and Stop The Cap[39] are currently working to oppose these efforts. On April 7, 2009, then US Congressman Eric Massa called on Time Warner to eliminate its broadband Internet cap.[40]
Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography[edit]
On March 16, 2010, Time Warner Cable's transmission of their Kids on Demand and Kids Pre-School on Demand channels on systems in eastern North Carolina was interrupted by programming from the adult pay television channel Playboy TV for approximately two hours between 6:15 a.m. and 8:15 a.m./EDT, in which a group of nude women talked and posed in a sexually suggestive manner.[41] This accidental display affected Time Warner's digital cable subscribers in four towns in the system's eastern North Carolina cluster, while other areas displayed a black screen. A Time Warner spokesperson said in a statement to Raleigh CBS affiliate WRAL, "It was a technical malfunction that caused the wrong previews to be shown on our kids' on-demand channels. Unfortunately it hit at the worst possible time on the worst possible channels."[42] A Time Warner executive said normal monitoring procedures did not take effect because the glitch affected only a few areas. Customers were told to pay the small fee, and that their next bill would be reduced. [43]
Cable clusters[edit]




Time Warner Cable ident used until 2010. Remained in use on its "Business Class" division.



West Coast cluster

California – Barstow, Desert Cities, Orange County, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego
Hawaii (operating as Oceanic Time Warner Cable)


Midwest cluster

Kansas – Kansas City, Overland Park, Olathe, Shawnee
Missouri – Kansas City, Independence, Lee's Summit
Nebraska
Ohio – Akron, Bowling Green/North Baltimore, Canton, Cincinnati, Cleveland, Columbus, Dayton, Findlay/Lima, and Youngstown
Kentucky – Lexington, Louisville, Northern Kentucky, Ashland
Pennsylvania – Erie County, Sharon, Franklin
Wisconsin – Green Bay and Milwaukee


Northeast cluster

Maine
New Hampshire – Berlin, Keene
Massachusetts – Athol, Pittsfield
Upstate New York


The Carolinas cluster

North Carolina – Charlotte, Raleigh, Greensboro, and Wilmington
South Carolina – Columbia, Sumter, Florence, Summerville, Hilton Head and Myrtle Beach.


New York cluster

New Jersey – Bergen County, Hudson County
New York – New York City (Manhattan, Queens, Staten Island, most of western Brooklyn); Mount Vernon (Westchester County, rest of county is Cablevision)


Texas cluster

Texas – Arlington, Austin, Beaumont/Port Arthur, Corpus Christi, Dallas, El Paso, Harlingen, Killeen/Temple, Laredo, Rio Grande Valley, San Antonio, Waco, and Wichita Falls

coincidentally, the Irving-Grapevine-Coppell-Lewisville cluster had been under Time Warner Cable's control upon acquisition of Paragon Cable. This was prior to AT&T Broadband's full absorption of that cluster.




Not in a cluster (National)

Alabama – Dothan, Enterprise
Arizona – Yuma
California – El Centro
Colorado – Gunnison, Telluride
Idaho – Coeur d'Alene, Moscow
Indiana – Terre Haute
Virginia
Washington – Pullman
West Virginia – Clarksburg



Divisions[edit]
Time Warner Cable's divisions, from official website:
West Region[edit]




Former logo for "Oceanic Time Warner Cable" division



PAC West Region

Oceanic Time Warner Cable (Hawaii)
Time Warner Cable Desert Cities
Time Warner Cable San Diego
Time Warner Cable Southern California (SoCal)


Midwest Region

Time Warner Cable Kansas City
Time Warner Cable Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Northeast Ohio & Western Pennsylvania (Akron, Canton, Cleveland & Youngstown; Erie County & Sharon, PA)
Time Warner Cable Mid-Ohio (Columbus)
Time Warner Cable Southwest Ohio (Dayton; Cincinnati; Lexington, KY; Louisville, KY; Terre Haute, IN; Clarksburg, WV)
Time Warner Cable Wisconsin (Milwaukee & Green Bay)


Texas Region
Time Warner Cable National (non-clustered systems)

East Region[edit]




Time Warner Cable Spectrum.



Northeast Region

Time Warner Cable Albany
Time Warner Cable Buffalo
Time Warner Cable Rochester
Time Warner Cable Central New York / Syracuse
Time Warner Cable New England
Time Warner Cable New York City


Carolinas Region

Time Warner Cable Charlotte
Time Warner Cable Greensboro
Time Warner Cable Eastern Carolina
Time Warner Cable Raleigh
Time Warner Cable South Carolina (Columbia)
Time Warner Cable Fayetteville/Sandhills



Former divisions[edit]
Sold to Comcast

Time Warner Cable Houma
Time Warner Cable Houston
Time Warner Cable Lake City/Live Oak
Time Warner Cable Mid-South (Memphis, TN, AR, and MS)
Time Warner Cable Minnesota
Time Warner Cable Shreveport
Time Warner Cable St. Augustine/Palatka
Time Warner Cable Cape Coral/Naples

Divisions that became Bright House Networks

Time Warner Cable Central Florida[44]
Time Warner Cable Tampa Bay

Rankings[edit]
The American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI) ranked Time Warner Cable as one of the least liked companies in terms of customer satisfaction in 2011,[45] 2012,[46] 2013,[7][47] and 2014.[48]
See also[edit]

List of United States telephone companies
Spectrum Sports

References[edit]


^ "Top 25 Multichannel Video Service Customers (2012)". National Cable & Telecommunications Association. Retrieved 2013-01-02. 
^ "Investor Relations Contact Us." Time Warner Cable. Retrieved on March 6, 2010.
^ "Locations". Time Warner Cable. Archived from the original on July 16, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2012. 
^ Smith, Gerry (June 25, 2015). "Charter Promises Faster, Cheaper Internet to Win Merger Approval". Bloomberg. 
^ a b "So Long Time Warner Cable: Charter to Retire Much-Maligned Brand". Bloomberg. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Glenn Britt timeline" (PDF). 
^ a b Henry, David; Sherman, Alex (June 11, 2014). "Glenn Britt, Who Raised Time Warner Cable Shares, Dies at 65". Bloomberg. Retrieved September 6, 2014. 
^ "Time Warner Cable Spinoff to Finish Next Month". New York Times. February 27, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner's $9 Billion Cable Spinoff". CBS News. Associated Press. May 21, 2008. Retrieved May 23, 2008. 
^ "Time Warner Sets Final Distribution Ratio For Cable Spinoff". Dow Jones (via CNN Money). March 20, 2009. Retrieved March 27, 2009. [dead link]
^ Lasar, Matthew (June 24, 2009). "Is Comcast and TimeWarner's "TV Everywhere" TV for everyone?". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ Cheng, Jacqui (December 15, 2009). "Comcast expands online video to all cable+Internet customers". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ "Analyst: Charter, Time Warner Cable Merger Looks Probable". Fox Business.com. September 11, 2013. Retrieved September 11, 2013. 
^ Flint, Joe; James, Meg (November 22, 2013). "Charter Communications and Comcast may battle for Time Warner Cable". New York Times. Retrieved November 22, 2013. 
^ Baker, Liana B. (February 13, 2014). "CORRECTED-UPDATE 7-Comcast takeover of Time Warner Cable to reshape U.S. pay TV". Reuters. Retrieved 13 February 2014. 
^ "Netflix Says It Opposes Comcast’s Merger Bid". The New York Times. 21 Apr 2014. Retrieved 25 Apr 2014. 
^ "More Than 50 Public Interest Groups Speak Out Against the Comcast-Time Warner Cable Merger". Freepress.net. 8 Apr 2014. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Julian Hattem (24 Mar 2014). "Writers Guild protests Comcast-Time Warner deal". The Hill. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Ira Teinowitz (9 Apr 2014). "Consumer Group Slams Comcast, Time-Warner Deal at New Senate Hearing (Updated)". The Wrap. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ "Comcast/TWC merger may be blocked by Justice Department". Ars Technica. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Comcast / Time Warner Cable / Charter Transactions Terminated – Comcast Press Statement". Comcast. Retrieved 24 April 2015. 
^ Sherman, Alex (25 May 2015). "Charter Near Deal for Time Warner Cable at $195 a Share". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 25 May 2015. 
^ McGrath, Maggie (28 April 2014). "Comcast Strikes Deal With Charter To Divest Nearly 4 Million Subscribers". Forbes. Retrieved 9 June 2014. 
^ a b Steel, Emily (May 26, 2015). "Charter Communications Agrees to Acquire Time Warner Cable". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Charter completes purchase of Time Warner Cable, Bright House". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Charter introduces Spectrum brand in Southern California". Los Angeles Times. September 20, 2016. Retrieved September 21, 2016. 
^ "About Us - Time Warner Cable's Company History and News". 
^ Leichtman Research Group, "Research Notes," First Quarter 2012, pg. 6, Time Warner (#5) with 4,544,000 residential phone lines.
^ "Heavy Reading: Cable Biz Sales to Hit $8.5B | Light Reading". 
^ "Deals widen Bobcats' TV reach". Charlotte.com. April 9, 2008. Retrieved April 16, 2008. 
^ "CNNMoney.com: Time Warner to save on programming costs after Adelphia Deal – Jul, 31. 2006". CNN. July 31, 2006. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Press Release: Time Warner Cable Becomes a Public Company". Timewarner.com. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ Ehling, Jeff (August 2, 2006). "Time-Warner Cable leaving Houston". KTRK-TV. American Broadcasting Company. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Cable buys NaviSite as hosting acquisitions pick up". zdnet.com. February 1, 2011. Retrieved August 21, 2011. 
^ "Lexington, KY local and state news by the Lexington Herald-Leader – Kentucky.com". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Time Warner Cable to acquire Regional Fiber Optic Network Company DukeNet Communications". Retrieved 8 October 2013. 
^ Lawson, Stephen (January 18, 2008). "Time Warner to Try Tiered Cable Pricing". IDG News Service. PC World. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ "Stop TWC – More Info Coming Soon! Please Check Back!". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Stop the Cap!". Stop the Cap!. Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ Massa, Eric. "Congressman Eric Massa calls on Time Warner to eliminate Broadband Internet Cap". Archived from the original on April 9, 2009. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ Pearson, Erica (March 17, 2010). "Time Warner apologizes for accidentally showing Playboy previews on kiddie channels in N.C". Daily News. New York. 
^ Davis, Stacy (2010-03-16). "Time Warner apologizes for Playboy-kids channel glitch". WRAL.com. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ [1] Archived February 3, 2013, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Time Warner Cable changes name to Bright House". Orlando Business Journal. American City Business Journals. March 7, 2003. 
^ Lubin, Gus; Vivian Giang (2011-06-29). "The 19 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ Spector, Dina; Gus Lubin; Vivian Giang (2012-06-22). "The 15 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ "Benchmarks by Companies: All Companies". American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI). 
^ Fottrell, Quentin (December 31, 2014). "The most unpopular company in America is …". MarketWatch. Retrieved January 25, 2015. 








v
t
e


Charter Communications



Leadership



Thomas M. Rutledge (CEO)





Internet properties



Spectrum Internet





Cable
television
channels




News channels



Austin
Buffalo
Capital Region
Central NY
Florida

Bay News 9
News 13
InfoMás


New York City

NY1
NY1 Noticias
NY1 Rail and Road


North Carolina
Rochester





Sports channels



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet/Deportes LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





Local / Regional



Charter TV3 (Worcester)
Spectrum Community

Maine
Southern California


Spectrum OC16 (Hawaii)













Links to related articles











v
t
e


Liberty Interactive



Liberty Interactive Group



Bodybuilding.com (83%)
BuySeasons
CommerceHub (99%)
Evite
Gifts.com
HSN (34%)
Provide Commerce (ProFlowers)
QVC

Zulily


Right Start





Liberty Ventures Group



Expedia, Inc. (18%)
Interval International (30%)
Tree.com (25%)
TripAdvisor (26%)












v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other specialty television providers in the United States



Cable MVPD



Adams Cable
Allegiance Communications
Altice USA

Optimum
Suddenlink Communications


Armstrong
Atlantic Broadband
Blue Ridge Communications
Blue Stream
Broadstripe
Buckeye Broadband
Cable One
Charter Spectrum
Comcast Xfinity
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


Cox Communications
Docomo Pacific
Emery Telcom
Full Channel
GCI
Hargray
Layer3 TV
Mediacom
Midco
Northland Communications
OneLink Communications
Satview Broadband
Service Electric
SRT Communications
TDS Telecom
TPG

Grande Communications
RCN Corporation
Wave Broadband


TruVista Communications
WOW!





Satellite MVPD



Claro
Dish Network
DirecTV
Glorystar
Headend in the Sky
Home2US





Fiber MVPD / IPTV



AT&T U-verse
CenturyLink Prism TV
Cincinnati Bell FiOptics
Claro
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


EPB
Frontier FiOS
Google Fiber
GTA Teleguam
Hawaiian Telcom
Layer3 TV
Midco
NEP Datastream TV
TDS Telecom
Verizon FiOS
Windstream Kinetic





Virtual MVPD



DirecTV Now
FuboTV
Hulu with Live TV
PlayStation Vue
Skitter TV
Sling TV
YouTube TV





Over-the-top



Amazon Video
Anime Network
Apple TV (iTunes Store)
CBS All Access
Crackle
Crunchyroll
CW Seed
CuriosityStream
DramaFever
Fandor
Feeln
FunimationNow
go90
HBO Now
History Vault
Hulu
iON (IPTV)
Lifetime Movie Club
Netflix
Noggin
Pluto TV
Roku
Seeso
Showtime
StarzPlay
Tribeca Shortlist
Tubi TV
Univision NOW
Yupptv





Defunct cable



Adelphia Communications Corporation
Alameda Power and Telecom1
Astound Broadband
AT&T Broadband

MediaOne / Continental Cablevision
Tele-Communications Inc.


Baja Broadband

US Cable


Bresnan Communications
Bright House Networks
Cablevision
Champion Broadband
Cobridge Communications
Community Home Entertainment
Graceba Total Communications
Insight Communications
Jones Intercable
King Videocable
Knology
Marcus Cable
NPG Cable
Paragon Cable
Rapid Communications
TelePrompTer / Group W Cable
Time Warner Cable
UA-Columbia Cablevision
Windjammer Communications

1 – Still in operation, but no longer offers cable or Internet as part of its services




Defunct satellite



AlphaStar
GlobeCast World TV
PrimeStar
United States Satellite Broadcasting
Voom HD Networks





Defunct IPTV



Sky Angel
Virtual Digital Cable





Defunct terrestrial



Aereo
USDTV
MovieBeam





See also



Radio spectrum pollution












v
t
e


Additional resources on North American television



North America



List of local television stations in North America
DTV transition
North American TV mini-template





Canada



Canadian networks
List of Canadian television networks
List of Canadian television channels
List of Canadian specialty channels
Local Canadian TV stations
List of United States stations available in Canada
2001 Vancouver TV realignment
2007 Canada broadcast TV realignment





Mexico



Mexican networks
Local Mexican TV stations





United States



American networks
List of American cable and satellite networks
List of American over-the-air networks
Local American TV stations (W)
Local American TV stations (K)
Spanish-language TV networks
1994 United States broadcast TV realignment
2006 United States broadcast TV realignment
List of Canadian television stations available in the United States
Insular Areas TV











Africa, Asia, and Oceania
Americas
Europe












v
t
e


Sports television in the United States



Broadcast
divisions





English




American Sports Network
CBS Sports
ESPN on ABC
Fox Sports
NBC Sports
Turner Sports






Spanish




Azteca
Telemundo Deportes (Telemundo/Universo)
Univision Deportes








National
channels





English




beIN Sports
CBS Sports Network
ESPN

ESPN2


FS1

FS2


NBCSN
Olympic Channel






Spanish




beIN Sports en Español
ESPN Deportes
Fox Deportes
Univision Deportes Network








Specialty
channels





College




Big Ten Network
ESPNU
Fox College Sports
Longhorn Network
Pac-12 Network
SEC Network






Single sport




Cricket TicketO
ESPN College Extra
ESPN Goal Line/Buzzer BeaterP
Fox Soccer PlusP
GOL TV
Golf Channel
In DemandP
MAVTV
MLB Network
MLB Extra InningsO
MLB Strike ZoneP
MLS Direct KickO
NBA League PassO
NBA TV
NFL Network
NFL RedZoneP
NFL Sunday TicketO
NHL Network
NHL Center IceO
Tennis Channel
TVG

TVG2


Willow






Outdoors




Frost Great Outdoors
Outdoor Channel
Pursuit Channel
Sportsman Channel
World Fishing Network






Other




Eleven Sports Network
ESPN Classic
ESPNews
ESPN PPVP
Ride TV








Syndicators



ACC Network (Raycom Sports)
ESPN Events





Broadband



Fox Sports Go
MLB.tv
UFC Fight Pass
WatchESPN (ESPN3)
WWE Network
WWNLive





Video on demand



The Ski Channel
Surf Channel













v
t
e


Regional sports television networks in the United States



AT&T SportsNet



Northwest
Pittsburgh
Rocky Mountain
Southwest
Utah





Fox Sports Networks



Arizona
Detroit
Florida / Sun
Midwest

Indiana
Kansas City


North
Ohio / SportsTime Ohio
Southeast / South

Carolinas
Tennessee


Southwest

Oklahoma
New Orleans


West / Prime Ticket

San Diego


Wisconsin
YES Network





NBC Sports Regional Networks
(Comcast)



Bay Area
California
Chicago
Mid-Atlantic
New England
Northwest

Oregon Sports Network


Philadelphia





Spectrum Sports
(Charter)



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





YurView (Cox)



Arizona
California
Kansas
Las Vegas
Louisiana
New England
Oklahoma
Virginia





Independents



Altitude Sports
Buckeye Cable Sports
BYUtv Sports
Cox Sports TV
FiOS1
Longhorn Network
Mid-Atlantic Sports
Midco Sports
MSG Network

Plus
Western NY


NESN
SportsNet NY
SWX Right Now


















v
t
e


Defunct television sports networks in the United States



National



America One
American Sports Classics
Back9Network
Baseball Network
Big 12 Network
CNN SI
ESPN 3D
Football Network
Fox Soccer
Lorimar Sports Network
Mizlou
NASCAR Hot Pass
NewSport
One World Sports
ONTV
SEC TV
Speed
SportsChannel America
Sports Network
Universal Sports Network





Regional



4SD
Carolinas SE
Cox Sports
Empire
Hawkvision
MountainWest
PASS Sports
Prime
PRISM
Royals Sports
SportsChannel LA
Sportsvision
Sports Time
Victory





Out-of-market



ESPN Full Court
ESPN GamePlan
Mega March Madness











O. Out-of-market sports packages P. Premium channel













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Time_Warner_Cable&oldid=792249246"					
Categories: Time Warner CableCable television companies of the United StatesCompanies based in Fairfield County, ConnecticutEntertainment companies established in 1973Media companies established in 1973Media companies disestablished in 2016Media companies of the United States1973 establishments in the United States2016 disestablishments in the United StatesCompanies formerly listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFormer Time Warner subsidiariesVoIP companies of the United States2016 acquisitionsCorporate spin-offsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2010Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from June 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaNederlands日本語Simple EnglishSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 12:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Time Warner Cable - Wikipedia






















 






Time Warner Cable

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search


Time Warner Cable Inc.


Time Warner Cable's final logo used until the acquisition with Charter Communications.




Former type

Subsidiary


Industry
Telecommunications
Mass media


Fate
Acquired by Charter Communications


Successor
Spectrum


Founded
1973; 44 years ago (1973)


Founder
Time Warner
(merger of Time Inc. & Warner Communications)


Defunct
2016; 1 year ago (2016)


Headquarters
Time Warner Center, New York City, New York, United States



Area served

United States



Key people

Robert D. Marcus
(Chairman & CEO)


Parent
Warner Communications (1973–1990)
Time Warner (1990-2009) Charter Communications (2016-Present)


Subsidiaries
Time Warner Cable Enterprises LLC






Time Warner Center, formerly the headquarters of the company in New York City. It was shared by its namesake, but now unrelated company, Time Warner.






Time Warner Cable building entrance in Morrisville, North Carolina


Time Warner Cable (TWC) was an American cable television company. Prior to its purchase by Charter Communications in 2016, it was ranked the second largest cable company in the United States by revenue behind only Comcast, operating in 29 states.[1] Its corporate headquarters were located in the Time Warner Center in Midtown Manhattan, New York City,[2] with other corporate offices in Stamford, Connecticut; Charlotte, North Carolina; and Herndon, Virginia.[3]
It was controlled by Warner Communications, then by Time Warner (the film and television production company and cable channel operator). That company spun off the cable operations in March 2009 as part of a larger restructuring. From 2009 to 2016, Time Warner Cable was an entirely independent company, continuing to use the Time Warner name under license from its former parent (including the "Road Runner" name for its Internet service, now Spectrum Internet).
In 2014, the company was the subject of a proposed purchase by Comcast Corporation, valued at $45.2 billion; however, following opposition to the deal by various groups, along with plans by the U.S. government to try to block the merger, Comcast called off the deal in April 2015. On May 26, 2015, Charter Communications announced that it would acquire Time Warner Cable for $78.7 billion, along with Bright House Networks in a separate $10.1 billion deal, pending regulatory approval.[4]
The purchase was completed on May 18, 2016; Charter had continued to do business as Time Warner Cable in its former markets, but has now re-branded these operations under the Spectrum brand in most markets.[5]



Contents


1 History

1.1 Sale


2 Residential services
3 Business services
4 Cable Internet service
5 Naming rights

5.1 Current

5.1.1 Arena


5.2 Former

5.2.1 Fox Cities Stadium




6 Acquisitions

6.1 Adelphia
6.2 NaviSite
6.3 Insight Communications
6.4 DukeNet Communications


7 Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)
8 Venture with Sprint Nextel
9 Controversies

9.1 Bandwidth metering
9.2 Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography


10 Cable clusters
11 Divisions

11.1 West Region
11.2 East Region
11.3 Former divisions


12 Rankings
13 See also
14 References



History[edit]
Time Warner Cable was formed in 1992 by the merger of Time Inc.'s cable television company, American Television and Communications Corp. (service areas that had belonged to that company went under the Time Warner Communications name; since the 1990s, areas that had used that name have either been renamed to Time Warner Cable, Bright House Networks, or have been given to other cable providers), and Warner Cable, a division of Warner Communications, as a result of a merger to form Time Warner; for the two years after the merger, the companies operated separately but under the umbrella name "Time Warner Cable Group" (primarily due to 18% of ATC having been publicly owned at the time); they merged into one entity in 1992. It also includes the remnants of the defunct QUBE interactive TV service. In 1995, the company launched the Southern Tier On-Line Community, a cable modem service later known as Road Runner High Speed Online. That year, talks began that would later result in Warner's acquisition of Paragon Cable. Glenn Britt (1949–2014)[6][7] was the CEO from 2001 until December 2013.
Time Warner retained Time Warner Cable as a subsidiary until March 2009, when it was spun out as an independent company.[8] Prior to the spin-out, Time Warner had held an 84% stake in Time Warner Cable.[9] Non-Time Warner shareholders received 0.083670 shares for each share already owned. This move made Time Warner Cable the largest cable operator in the United States owned solely by a single class of shareholders (without supervoting stock).[10]
Time Warner Cable launched DVR service in the Houston area in 2004. (TWC's Houston-area cable systems are now owned by Comcast.) When first launched, it used Scientific-Atlanta set-top boxes with DVR.
In June 2009, Time Warner Cable unveiled a concept known as "TV Everywhere"—a means of allowing multi-platform access to live and on-demand content to content from television channels that is tied to a user's television subscription.[11][12]
Sale[edit]
Main article: Attempted purchase of Time Warner Cable by Comcast
It was first reported in October 2013 that Time Warner Cable was exploring a sale of the company, possibly to Charter Communications.[13] However, on November 22, 2013, reports surfaced that Comcast expressed interest in acquiring Time Warner Cable. Both companies were said to be placing bids for the company.[14] Charter reiterated its interest in purchasing Time Warner Cable and increased its bid on January 14, 2014. On February 12, 2014, it was reported that Comcast had reached a deal to acquire TWC in an overall deal valued at $45.2 billion, pending regulatory approval.[15]
The proposed merger was met with prominent opposition from various groups, showing concerns that the sheer size of the combined company would reduce competition and would give Comcast an unprecedented level of control over the United States' internet and television industries, increased leverage in the distribution of NBCUniversal content, hamper over-the-top services, and lead to higher prices for its services.[16][17][18][19] In April 2015, it was reported that the U.S. Department of Justice was preparing to file an antitrust lawsuit against the companies in a bid to halt the merger, primarily because the merged company would have controlled 57 percent of the nation's broadband capacity. On April 24, 2015, Comcast officially announced that it had called off the merger.[20][21]
On May 25, 2015, Bloomberg News reported that Charter was "near" a deal to acquire TWC for $195 a share.[22] Charter had been involved in the Comcast/TWC merger, as the companies planned to divest around 4 million subscribers to Charter in order to reduce the combined company's market share to an acceptable level.[23] The next day, Charter officially announced its intent to acquire Time Warner Cable in a deal valued at $78.7 billion, and confirmed that it would also continue with its proposed, $10.1 billion acquisition of Bright House Networks. The deal was subject to regulatory approval, although due to the relatively smaller size of the companies and their media holdings, the deal was expected to face less resistance than the Comcast/TWC merger.[24]
The acquisition was completed on May 18, 2016. The Time Warner Cable brand was phased out in favor of Spectrum, the brand used by Charter to market its services.[25][5][26]
Residential services[edit]
As of second quarter 2009, there were 14.6 million basic cable subscribers, 8.8 million Digital cable subscribers, 8.7 million Road Runner residential subscribers, 2.5 million DVR subscribers,[27] and 4.5 million residential Digital Phone subscribers, which makes it the fifth-largest landline phone provider in the United States.[28]
Business services[edit]
As of 2013, Time Warner Cable's business division had the second largest business-facing enterprise by revenue (of cable providers who offer business services), with $1.7 billion in revenue as of the third quarter of 2013. Total revenue for 2012 was $1.9 billion.[29]
Cable Internet service[edit]
Main article: Spectrum Internet
Naming rights[edit]
Current[edit]
Arena[edit]
Spectrum Center, formerly Time Warner Cable Arena, is located in Charlotte, North Carolina, the home of the NBA's Charlotte Hornets. In April 2008, the then-Bobcats reached a naming rights deal with Time Warner Cable, the Charlotte area's major cable television provider; the arena was named for the cable provider in exchange for the release of the team's television rights, which had been on the TWC co-owned Carolinas Sports Entertainment Television for its first season, which failed to find much cable coverage in the Charlotte market outside of Time Warner systems and went dark after a year, and then News 14 Carolina which was limited to only the North Carolina side of the market, until the arena naming rights deal was made. The team moved to the new Fox Sports South sub-feed Fox Sports Carolinas and SportSouth (now Fox Sports Southeast) with the 2008-09 season, allowing coverage through both the Carolinas.[30] Shortly after being acquired by Charter, the arena was renamed to Spectrum Center.
Former[edit]
Fox Cities Stadium[edit]
Main article: Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium
On March 9, 2007, Time Warner Cable, which provides service to the northeastern Wisconsin area, signed a 10-year naming rights deal. The field is home of the Wisconsin Timber Rattlers, a local minor league baseball team of the Midwest League and affiliate of the Milwaukee Brewers, based in Grand Chute, a suburb of Appleton. The team and Time Warner Cable mutually agreed to end the rights deal after the 2013 season, and the venue is now known as Neuroscience Group Field at Fox Cities Stadium, named for a local neurology practice.
Acquisitions[edit]
Adelphia[edit]
On July 31, 2007, Time Warner Cable and Comcast completed a deal to purchase practically all of Adelphia's assets for $17 billion.[31] Time Warner Cable gained 3.3 million of Adelphia's subscribers, a 29 percent increase, while Comcast gained almost 1.7 million subscribers. Adelphia stockholders received 16% of Time Warner Cable. Time Warner Cable went public effective February 13, 2007, and the company began trading on the New York Stock Exchange on March 1, 2007.[32]
In addition to Adelphia's coverage being divided up, Time Warner Cable and Comcast also agreed to exchange some of their own subscribers in order to consolidate key regions. An example of this is the Los Angeles market, which was mostly covered by Comcast and Adelphia (and some areas of the region already served by TWC), is now under Time Warner Cable. Philadelphia had been split between Time Warner and Comcast, with the majority of cable subscribers belonging to Comcast. Time Warner subscribers in Philadelphia were swapped with Comcast in early 2007. Similarly, the Houston area, which was under Time Warner, was swapped to Comcast, while the Dallas metro area was changed to Time Warner (RR).[33] In the Twin Cities, Minneapolis was Time Warner and Saint Paul was Comcast. That whole market is now Comcast.
NaviSite[edit]
Time Warner Cable purchased NaviSite (NAVI), a company providing cloud and hosting services, on February 1, 2011 for $230 million, roughly equating to $5.50 per share.[34]
Insight Communications[edit]
On August 13, 2011, Time Warner Cable announced its purchase of Insight Communications for $3 billion acquiring Insight's 760,000 subscribers nationwide. The merger was completed February 29, 2012, and as of June 2013 all of Insight Communications was absorbed into Time Warner Cable.[35]
DukeNet Communications[edit]
On October 7, 2013, Time Warner Cable announced that it has agreed to acquire DukeNet Communications LLC for $600 million. DukeNet provides data and high-capacity bandwidth services to wireless carrier, data center, government, and enterprise customers in the Southeast.[36]
Advance/Newhouse and Time Warner (Bright House Networks spin off)[edit]
Some of the regional cable system clusters operated by Time Warner Cable are owned by the Time Warner Entertainment – Advance/Newhouse Partnership (TWEAN). In 2002, Advance/Newhouse Communications, unhappy with some of the operating policies of Time Warner Cable in the AOL Time Warner era, forced a restructuring of the TWEAN partnership such that Advance/Newhouse would actively manage and operate a portion of the jointly owned cable systems equal to their percentage of equity. Under this arrangement, Advance/Newhouse enjoys the proceeds of their actively managed systems rather than simply a percentage of the partnership's total earnings. The majority of the affected systems are in the Tampa and Orlando markets under the Bright House Networks brand.
The value of this deal is that it allows Advance/Newhouse to more directly control their cable investments without having to completely unravel the TWEAN partnership, which does bring some benefits via Time Warner's development and purchasing clout.
The transactions proposed by Charter were approved, TWC and Bright House Networks have been absorbed into Charter.[24]
Venture with Sprint Nextel[edit]
In late 2005, TWC and several other cable companies formed a venture with Sprint Nextel. This joint venture enables TWC customers to receive a full suite of products, linking in-home and out-of-home entertainment, information, and communications services. All of this was included in the new "Triple Play on the Go", similar to the Triple Play[discuss] but an addition of new services through Sprint Nextel.
Controversies[edit]
Bandwidth metering[edit]
In Beaumont, Texas, during 2008, Time Warner Cable began testing tier-based metered data plans that effectively placed customers into a pricing hierarchy based on the amount of data that they used, [clarification needed].[37] In 2009, Time Warner Cable announced that additional cities including Rochester, New York will become additional test sites. In particular in Rochester groups have formed to stop TWC. Several groups including Stop TWC[38] and Stop The Cap[39] are currently working to oppose these efforts. On April 7, 2009, then US Congressman Eric Massa called on Time Warner to eliminate its broadband Internet cap.[40]
Signal intrusion and accidental transmission of pornography[edit]
On March 16, 2010, Time Warner Cable's transmission of their Kids on Demand and Kids Pre-School on Demand channels on systems in eastern North Carolina was interrupted by programming from the adult pay television channel Playboy TV for approximately two hours between 6:15 a.m. and 8:15 a.m./EDT, in which a group of nude women talked and posed in a sexually suggestive manner.[41] This accidental display affected Time Warner's digital cable subscribers in four towns in the system's eastern North Carolina cluster, while other areas displayed a black screen. A Time Warner spokesperson said in a statement to Raleigh CBS affiliate WRAL, "It was a technical malfunction that caused the wrong previews to be shown on our kids' on-demand channels. Unfortunately it hit at the worst possible time on the worst possible channels."[42] A Time Warner executive said normal monitoring procedures did not take effect because the glitch affected only a few areas. Customers were told to pay the small fee, and that their next bill would be reduced. [43]
Cable clusters[edit]




Time Warner Cable ident used until 2010. Remained in use on its "Business Class" division.



West Coast cluster

California – Barstow, Desert Cities, Orange County, Los Angeles, San Bernardino, San Diego
Hawaii (operating as Oceanic Time Warner Cable)


Midwest cluster

Kansas – Kansas City, Overland Park, Olathe, Shawnee
Missouri – Kansas City, Independence, Lee's Summit
Nebraska
Ohio – Akron, Bowling Green/North Baltimore, Canton, Cincinnati, Cleveland, Columbus, Dayton, Findlay/Lima, and Youngstown
Kentucky – Lexington, Louisville, Northern Kentucky, Ashland
Pennsylvania – Erie County, Sharon, Franklin
Wisconsin – Green Bay and Milwaukee


Northeast cluster

Maine
New Hampshire – Berlin, Keene
Massachusetts – Athol, Pittsfield
Upstate New York


The Carolinas cluster

North Carolina – Charlotte, Raleigh, Greensboro, and Wilmington
South Carolina – Columbia, Sumter, Florence, Summerville, Hilton Head and Myrtle Beach.


New York cluster

New Jersey – Bergen County, Hudson County
New York – New York City (Manhattan, Queens, Staten Island, most of western Brooklyn); Mount Vernon (Westchester County, rest of county is Cablevision)


Texas cluster

Texas – Arlington, Austin, Beaumont/Port Arthur, Corpus Christi, Dallas, El Paso, Harlingen, Killeen/Temple, Laredo, Rio Grande Valley, San Antonio, Waco, and Wichita Falls

coincidentally, the Irving-Grapevine-Coppell-Lewisville cluster had been under Time Warner Cable's control upon acquisition of Paragon Cable. This was prior to AT&T Broadband's full absorption of that cluster.




Not in a cluster (National)

Alabama – Dothan, Enterprise
Arizona – Yuma
California – El Centro
Colorado – Gunnison, Telluride
Idaho – Coeur d'Alene, Moscow
Indiana – Terre Haute
Virginia
Washington – Pullman
West Virginia – Clarksburg



Divisions[edit]
Time Warner Cable's divisions, from official website:
West Region[edit]




Former logo for "Oceanic Time Warner Cable" division



PAC West Region

Oceanic Time Warner Cable (Hawaii)
Time Warner Cable Desert Cities
Time Warner Cable San Diego
Time Warner Cable Southern California (SoCal)


Midwest Region

Time Warner Cable Kansas City
Time Warner Cable Nebraska
Time Warner Cable Northeast Ohio & Western Pennsylvania (Akron, Canton, Cleveland & Youngstown; Erie County & Sharon, PA)
Time Warner Cable Mid-Ohio (Columbus)
Time Warner Cable Southwest Ohio (Dayton; Cincinnati; Lexington, KY; Louisville, KY; Terre Haute, IN; Clarksburg, WV)
Time Warner Cable Wisconsin (Milwaukee & Green Bay)


Texas Region
Time Warner Cable National (non-clustered systems)

East Region[edit]




Time Warner Cable Spectrum.



Northeast Region

Time Warner Cable Albany
Time Warner Cable Buffalo
Time Warner Cable Rochester
Time Warner Cable Central New York / Syracuse
Time Warner Cable New England
Time Warner Cable New York City


Carolinas Region

Time Warner Cable Charlotte
Time Warner Cable Greensboro
Time Warner Cable Eastern Carolina
Time Warner Cable Raleigh
Time Warner Cable South Carolina (Columbia)
Time Warner Cable Fayetteville/Sandhills



Former divisions[edit]
Sold to Comcast

Time Warner Cable Houma
Time Warner Cable Houston
Time Warner Cable Lake City/Live Oak
Time Warner Cable Mid-South (Memphis, TN, AR, and MS)
Time Warner Cable Minnesota
Time Warner Cable Shreveport
Time Warner Cable St. Augustine/Palatka
Time Warner Cable Cape Coral/Naples

Divisions that became Bright House Networks

Time Warner Cable Central Florida[44]
Time Warner Cable Tampa Bay

Rankings[edit]
The American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI) ranked Time Warner Cable as one of the least liked companies in terms of customer satisfaction in 2011,[45] 2012,[46] 2013,[7][47] and 2014.[48]
See also[edit]

List of United States telephone companies
Spectrum Sports

References[edit]


^ "Top 25 Multichannel Video Service Customers (2012)". National Cable & Telecommunications Association. Retrieved 2013-01-02. 
^ "Investor Relations Contact Us." Time Warner Cable. Retrieved on March 6, 2010.
^ "Locations". Time Warner Cable. Archived from the original on July 16, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2012. 
^ Smith, Gerry (June 25, 2015). "Charter Promises Faster, Cheaper Internet to Win Merger Approval". Bloomberg. 
^ a b "So Long Time Warner Cable: Charter to Retire Much-Maligned Brand". Bloomberg. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Glenn Britt timeline" (PDF). 
^ a b Henry, David; Sherman, Alex (June 11, 2014). "Glenn Britt, Who Raised Time Warner Cable Shares, Dies at 65". Bloomberg. Retrieved September 6, 2014. 
^ "Time Warner Cable Spinoff to Finish Next Month". New York Times. February 27, 2009. Retrieved May 25, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner's $9 Billion Cable Spinoff". CBS News. Associated Press. May 21, 2008. Retrieved May 23, 2008. 
^ "Time Warner Sets Final Distribution Ratio For Cable Spinoff". Dow Jones (via CNN Money). March 20, 2009. Retrieved March 27, 2009. [dead link]
^ Lasar, Matthew (June 24, 2009). "Is Comcast and TimeWarner's "TV Everywhere" TV for everyone?". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ Cheng, Jacqui (December 15, 2009). "Comcast expands online video to all cable+Internet customers". Ars Technica. Condé Nast. Retrieved January 2, 2014. 
^ "Analyst: Charter, Time Warner Cable Merger Looks Probable". Fox Business.com. September 11, 2013. Retrieved September 11, 2013. 
^ Flint, Joe; James, Meg (November 22, 2013). "Charter Communications and Comcast may battle for Time Warner Cable". New York Times. Retrieved November 22, 2013. 
^ Baker, Liana B. (February 13, 2014). "CORRECTED-UPDATE 7-Comcast takeover of Time Warner Cable to reshape U.S. pay TV". Reuters. Retrieved 13 February 2014. 
^ "Netflix Says It Opposes Comcast’s Merger Bid". The New York Times. 21 Apr 2014. Retrieved 25 Apr 2014. 
^ "More Than 50 Public Interest Groups Speak Out Against the Comcast-Time Warner Cable Merger". Freepress.net. 8 Apr 2014. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Julian Hattem (24 Mar 2014). "Writers Guild protests Comcast-Time Warner deal". The Hill. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ Ira Teinowitz (9 Apr 2014). "Consumer Group Slams Comcast, Time-Warner Deal at New Senate Hearing (Updated)". The Wrap. Retrieved 14 Apr 2014. 
^ "Comcast/TWC merger may be blocked by Justice Department". Ars Technica. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Comcast / Time Warner Cable / Charter Transactions Terminated – Comcast Press Statement". Comcast. Retrieved 24 April 2015. 
^ Sherman, Alex (25 May 2015). "Charter Near Deal for Time Warner Cable at $195 a Share". Bloomberg News. Retrieved 25 May 2015. 
^ McGrath, Maggie (28 April 2014). "Comcast Strikes Deal With Charter To Divest Nearly 4 Million Subscribers". Forbes. Retrieved 9 June 2014. 
^ a b Steel, Emily (May 26, 2015). "Charter Communications Agrees to Acquire Time Warner Cable". The New York Times. Retrieved 26 May 2015. 
^ "Charter completes purchase of Time Warner Cable, Bright House". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved 18 May 2016. 
^ "Charter introduces Spectrum brand in Southern California". Los Angeles Times. September 20, 2016. Retrieved September 21, 2016. 
^ "About Us - Time Warner Cable's Company History and News". 
^ Leichtman Research Group, "Research Notes," First Quarter 2012, pg. 6, Time Warner (#5) with 4,544,000 residential phone lines.
^ "Heavy Reading: Cable Biz Sales to Hit $8.5B | Light Reading". 
^ "Deals widen Bobcats' TV reach". Charlotte.com. April 9, 2008. Retrieved April 16, 2008. 
^ "CNNMoney.com: Time Warner to save on programming costs after Adelphia Deal – Jul, 31. 2006". CNN. July 31, 2006. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Press Release: Time Warner Cable Becomes a Public Company". Timewarner.com. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ Ehling, Jeff (August 2, 2006). "Time-Warner Cable leaving Houston". KTRK-TV. American Broadcasting Company. Retrieved October 8, 2010. 
^ "Time Warner Cable buys NaviSite as hosting acquisitions pick up". zdnet.com. February 1, 2011. Retrieved August 21, 2011. 
^ "Lexington, KY local and state news by the Lexington Herald-Leader – Kentucky.com". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Time Warner Cable to acquire Regional Fiber Optic Network Company DukeNet Communications". Retrieved 8 October 2013. 
^ Lawson, Stephen (January 18, 2008). "Time Warner to Try Tiered Cable Pricing". IDG News Service. PC World. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ "Stop TWC – More Info Coming Soon! Please Check Back!". Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ "Stop the Cap!". Stop the Cap!. Retrieved May 27, 2015. 
^ Massa, Eric. "Congressman Eric Massa calls on Time Warner to eliminate Broadband Internet Cap". Archived from the original on April 9, 2009. Retrieved April 11, 2009. 
^ Pearson, Erica (March 17, 2010). "Time Warner apologizes for accidentally showing Playboy previews on kiddie channels in N.C". Daily News. New York. 
^ Davis, Stacy (2010-03-16). "Time Warner apologizes for Playboy-kids channel glitch". WRAL.com. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ [1] Archived February 3, 2013, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "Time Warner Cable changes name to Bright House". Orlando Business Journal. American City Business Journals. March 7, 2003. 
^ Lubin, Gus; Vivian Giang (2011-06-29). "The 19 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ Spector, Dina; Gus Lubin; Vivian Giang (2012-06-22). "The 15 Most Hated Companies In America". Business Insider. Retrieved 2013-08-05. 
^ "Benchmarks by Companies: All Companies". American Customer Satisfaction Index (ACSI). 
^ Fottrell, Quentin (December 31, 2014). "The most unpopular company in America is …". MarketWatch. Retrieved January 25, 2015. 








v
t
e


Charter Communications



Leadership



Thomas M. Rutledge (CEO)





Internet properties



Spectrum Internet





Cable
television
channels




News channels



Austin
Buffalo
Capital Region
Central NY
Florida

Bay News 9
News 13
InfoMás


New York City

NY1
NY1 Noticias
NY1 Rail and Road


North Carolina
Rochester





Sports channels



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet/Deportes LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





Local / Regional



Charter TV3 (Worcester)
Spectrum Community

Maine
Southern California


Spectrum OC16 (Hawaii)













Links to related articles











v
t
e


Liberty Interactive



Liberty Interactive Group



Bodybuilding.com (83%)
BuySeasons
CommerceHub (99%)
Evite
Gifts.com
HSN (34%)
Provide Commerce (ProFlowers)
QVC

Zulily


Right Start





Liberty Ventures Group



Expedia, Inc. (18%)
Interval International (30%)
Tree.com (25%)
TripAdvisor (26%)












v
t
e


Cable, satellite, and other specialty television providers in the United States



Cable MVPD



Adams Cable
Allegiance Communications
Altice USA

Optimum
Suddenlink Communications


Armstrong
Atlantic Broadband
Blue Ridge Communications
Blue Stream
Broadstripe
Buckeye Broadband
Cable One
Charter Spectrum
Comcast Xfinity
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


Cox Communications
Docomo Pacific
Emery Telcom
Full Channel
GCI
Hargray
Layer3 TV
Mediacom
Midco
Northland Communications
OneLink Communications
Satview Broadband
Service Electric
SRT Communications
TDS Telecom
TPG

Grande Communications
RCN Corporation
Wave Broadband


TruVista Communications
WOW!





Satellite MVPD



Claro
Dish Network
DirecTV
Glorystar
Headend in the Sky
Home2US





Fiber MVPD / IPTV



AT&T U-verse
CenturyLink Prism TV
Cincinnati Bell FiOptics
Claro
Consolidated Communications

FairPoint Communications


EPB
Frontier FiOS
Google Fiber
GTA Teleguam
Hawaiian Telcom
Layer3 TV
Midco
NEP Datastream TV
TDS Telecom
Verizon FiOS
Windstream Kinetic





Virtual MVPD



DirecTV Now
FuboTV
Hulu with Live TV
PlayStation Vue
Skitter TV
Sling TV
YouTube TV





Over-the-top



Amazon Video
Anime Network
Apple TV (iTunes Store)
CBS All Access
Crackle
Crunchyroll
CW Seed
CuriosityStream
DramaFever
Fandor
Feeln
FunimationNow
go90
HBO Now
History Vault
Hulu
iON (IPTV)
Lifetime Movie Club
Netflix
Noggin
Pluto TV
Roku
Seeso
Showtime
StarzPlay
Tribeca Shortlist
Tubi TV
Univision NOW
Yupptv





Defunct cable



Adelphia Communications Corporation
Alameda Power and Telecom1
Astound Broadband
AT&T Broadband

MediaOne / Continental Cablevision
Tele-Communications Inc.


Baja Broadband

US Cable


Bresnan Communications
Bright House Networks
Cablevision
Champion Broadband
Cobridge Communications
Community Home Entertainment
Graceba Total Communications
Insight Communications
Jones Intercable
King Videocable
Knology
Marcus Cable
NPG Cable
Paragon Cable
Rapid Communications
TelePrompTer / Group W Cable
Time Warner Cable
UA-Columbia Cablevision
Windjammer Communications

1 – Still in operation, but no longer offers cable or Internet as part of its services




Defunct satellite



AlphaStar
GlobeCast World TV
PrimeStar
United States Satellite Broadcasting
Voom HD Networks





Defunct IPTV



Sky Angel
Virtual Digital Cable





Defunct terrestrial



Aereo
USDTV
MovieBeam





See also



Radio spectrum pollution












v
t
e


Additional resources on North American television



North America



List of local television stations in North America
DTV transition
North American TV mini-template





Canada



Canadian networks
List of Canadian television networks
List of Canadian television channels
List of Canadian specialty channels
Local Canadian TV stations
List of United States stations available in Canada
2001 Vancouver TV realignment
2007 Canada broadcast TV realignment





Mexico



Mexican networks
Local Mexican TV stations





United States



American networks
List of American cable and satellite networks
List of American over-the-air networks
Local American TV stations (W)
Local American TV stations (K)
Spanish-language TV networks
1994 United States broadcast TV realignment
2006 United States broadcast TV realignment
List of Canadian television stations available in the United States
Insular Areas TV











Africa, Asia, and Oceania
Americas
Europe












v
t
e


Sports television in the United States



Broadcast
divisions





English




American Sports Network
CBS Sports
ESPN on ABC
Fox Sports
NBC Sports
Turner Sports






Spanish




Azteca
Telemundo Deportes (Telemundo/Universo)
Univision Deportes








National
channels





English




beIN Sports
CBS Sports Network
ESPN

ESPN2


FS1

FS2


NBCSN
Olympic Channel






Spanish




beIN Sports en Español
ESPN Deportes
Fox Deportes
Univision Deportes Network








Specialty
channels





College




Big Ten Network
ESPNU
Fox College Sports
Longhorn Network
Pac-12 Network
SEC Network






Single sport




Cricket TicketO
ESPN College Extra
ESPN Goal Line/Buzzer BeaterP
Fox Soccer PlusP
GOL TV
Golf Channel
In DemandP
MAVTV
MLB Network
MLB Extra InningsO
MLB Strike ZoneP
MLS Direct KickO
NBA League PassO
NBA TV
NFL Network
NFL RedZoneP
NFL Sunday TicketO
NHL Network
NHL Center IceO
Tennis Channel
TVG

TVG2


Willow






Outdoors




Frost Great Outdoors
Outdoor Channel
Pursuit Channel
Sportsman Channel
World Fishing Network






Other




Eleven Sports Network
ESPN Classic
ESPNews
ESPN PPVP
Ride TV








Syndicators



ACC Network (Raycom Sports)
ESPN Events





Broadband



Fox Sports Go
MLB.tv
UFC Fight Pass
WatchESPN (ESPN3)
WWE Network
WWNLive





Video on demand



The Ski Channel
Surf Channel













v
t
e


Regional sports television networks in the United States



AT&T SportsNet



Northwest
Pittsburgh
Rocky Mountain
Southwest
Utah





Fox Sports Networks



Arizona
Detroit
Florida / Sun
Midwest

Indiana
Kansas City


North
Ohio / SportsTime Ohio
Southeast / South

Carolinas
Tennessee


Southwest

Oklahoma
New Orleans


West / Prime Ticket

San Diego


Wisconsin
YES Network





NBC Sports Regional Networks
(Comcast)



Bay Area
California
Chicago
Mid-Atlantic
New England
Northwest

Oregon Sports Network


Philadelphia





Spectrum Sports
(Charter)



Carolinas
Florida
Kansas City
Los Angeles

SportsNet/Deportes
SportsNet LA


New York (Upstate)
SportsNet New York (part ownership)
Ohio
Texas
Wisconsin





YurView (Cox)



Arizona
California
Kansas
Las Vegas
Louisiana
New England
Oklahoma
Virginia





Independents



Altitude Sports
Buckeye Cable Sports
BYUtv Sports
Cox Sports TV
FiOS1
Longhorn Network
Mid-Atlantic Sports
Midco Sports
MSG Network

Plus
Western NY


NESN
SportsNet NY
SWX Right Now


















v
t
e


Defunct television sports networks in the United States



National



America One
American Sports Classics
Back9Network
Baseball Network
Big 12 Network
CNN SI
ESPN 3D
Football Network
Fox Soccer
Lorimar Sports Network
Mizlou
NASCAR Hot Pass
NewSport
One World Sports
ONTV
SEC TV
Speed
SportsChannel America
Sports Network
Universal Sports Network





Regional



4SD
Carolinas SE
Cox Sports
Empire
Hawkvision
MountainWest
PASS Sports
Prime
PRISM
Royals Sports
SportsChannel LA
Sportsvision
Sports Time
Victory





Out-of-market



ESPN Full Court
ESPN GamePlan
Mega March Madness











O. Out-of-market sports packages P. Premium channel













 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Time_Warner_Cable&oldid=792249246"					
Categories: Time Warner CableCable television companies of the United StatesCompanies based in Fairfield County, ConnecticutEntertainment companies established in 1973Media companies established in 1973Media companies disestablished in 2016Media companies of the United States1973 establishments in the United States2016 disestablishments in the United StatesCompanies formerly listed on the New York Stock ExchangeFormer Time Warner subsidiariesVoIP companies of the United States2016 acquisitionsCorporate spin-offsHidden categories: All articles with dead external linksArticles with dead external links from August 2010Webarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from June 2013Wikipedia articles needing clarification from August 2013 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages


العربيةEspañolفارسیFrançaisBahasa IndonesiaNederlands日本語Simple EnglishSvenska 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 25 July 2017, at 12:02.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































